DATE DOWNLOADED: Fri Jun 3 17:20:09 2022
SOURCE: Content Downloaded from HeinOnline

Citations:

Bluebook 21st ed.
Constitution and Bylaws of the Menominee Indian Tribe of Wisconsin (1977).

ALWD 7th ed.
. Constitution & Bylaws of the Menominee Indian Tribe of Wisconsin (1977).

APA 7th ed.
(1977). Constitution and Bylaws of the Menominee Indian Tribe of Wisconsin. S.I., 
s.n.

Chicago 17th ed.
Constitution and Bylaws of the Menominee Indian Tribe of Wisconsin. S.I., s.n.

McGill Guide 9th ed.
Constitution & Bylaws of the Menominee Indian Tribe of Wisconsin (S.I.: s.n., 1977)

AGLC 4th ed.
Constitution and Bylaws of the Menominee Indian Tribe of Wisconsin (s.n., 1977

MLA 9th ed.
Constitution and Bylaws of the Menominee Indian Tribe of Wisconsin. S.I., s.n.
HeinOnline.

OSCOLA 4th ed.
Constitution and Bylaws of the Menominee Indian Tribe of Wisconsin. S.I., s.n.

Provided by:
Pritzker Legal Research Center, Northwestern Pritzker School of Law

-- Your use of this HeinOnline PDF indicates your acceptance of HeinOnline's Terms and 

Conditions of the license agreement available at
https://heinonline.org/HOULicense

-- The search text of this PDF is generated from uncorrected OCR text.
 
 

CONSTITUTION AND BYLAWS

OF THE

MENOMINEE INDIAN TRIBE OF WISCONSIN

TABLE OF CONTENTS

 
 PREAMBLE ...... .....................................................................

ARTICLE I - JURISDICTION.............................................................

ARTICLE II - TRIBAL MEMBERSHIP .................................................

Section 1.  Requirements.................................................

Section 2. 

Ineligibility For Membership or 
Automatic Forfeiture of Membership . .

Section 3.  Enrollment Committee .........

Section 4.  Appeal From Denial of . 

Membership Application ... ................

Section 5.  Removal From Membership Roll 

By Tribal legislature ........

Section 6.  Voluntary Relinquishment of Membership

Section 7.  Enforcement.................................................  .

ARTICLE III - POWERS OF THE TRIBAL GOVERNMENT. .....

Section 1.  Powers of the Tribal Legislature. . .

Section 2.  Powers of the Tribal Judiciary ....

Section 3.  Separation of Powers .........

ARTICLE IV - THE TRIBAL LEGISLATURE........................................

Section 1.  Composition, Terms of 

Office, and Classes............

Section 2.  Initial Division of Tribal

Legislature Into classes .......

Section 3.  Election of Tribal Legislators ....

Section 4.  Requirements For Candidates For 

Election To the Tribal Legislature 
And For Tribal Legislators ....................

Section 5.  Consecutive and Simultaneous 

Terms of Office................... .

1

1

1

1

2

2

2

3

3

3

3

3

4

4

4

4

5

5

6

6

Section 6.  Community Committees of The 
Tribal Legislature . ....

Section 7.  Administration of Tribal Government.

Section 8.  Powers and Duties, .................................

ARTICLE V - THE TRIBAL JUDICIARY ...........

Section 1.  Structure........................ ....

Section 2.  Appointment and Term of office . . .

Section 3.  Compensation .............................................

Section 4.  Qualification and Disqualifications.

Section 5.  Removal Fran Office by Tribal 

Legislature and Automatic Vacancies.

Section 6.  Rules of Tribal Courts........................

Section 7  Records and Court Clerk........................

Section 8.  Appropriations....................................  .

Section 9  Enforcement. ...... ....................

ARTICLE VI - TRTBAL FLECTIONS................................................................

Section 1.  Voter Requirements........................  . 

.

Section 2.  Voting ................  . ................................

Section 3.  Action By the Tribe: 

Approval - Disapproval. 
Consent - Rejection........

Section 4.  Regular and Special Elections. 

. 

.  .

Section 5.  Tribal Election Commission................

Section 6.  Election Which Result in Ties. 

. 

.  .

Section 7.  Disputed Elections.........................  . 

.

Section 8.  Duty To Enforce This Article . 

. 

.  .

7

7

7

7

7

8

8

8

9

9

9

9

10

10

10

10

10

10

10

11

11

12


ARTICLE VII - REMOVAL OF EJECTED OFFICIALS FROM OFFICE 

AUTOMATIC VACANCY AND THE FILLING OF VACANCIES


Section 1.  Recall ...............................

Section 2.  Expulsion and Suspension of

Tribal Legislators ....................

Section 3.  Automatic Vacancies....................

Section 4.  The Filling of Vacancies in Office ....

Section 5.  Tribal Judiciary Excluded......... .

ARTICLE VIII - INITIATIVE AND REFERENDUM................

Section 1.  General Authority. ............

Section 2.  Procedure...................... ................................

Section 3.  Referendum Petitions: Suspension of

Effect of Ordinance in Question.........

Section 4.  Action on Petitions. ...........

Section 5.  Results of Election.................   .

Section 6.  Re-enactments, Amendment or Repeal ....
 
 

ARTICLE IX - RIGHTS OF TRIBAL MEMBERS AND OTHER

 
 PERSONS SUBJECT TO TRIBAL JURISDICTION.......

Section 1.  Hunting, Fishing, Trapping, Gathering. . .

Section 2.  Rights of Persons Subject To 
Tribal Jurisdiction.........


ARTICLE X - LIMITED POWER OF TRIBAL LEGISLATURE TO TRANSFER

OWNERSHIP OF, OR TO ENCUMBER, TRIBAL LAND 

OR INTERESTS THEREIN.........................................................

Section 1. 

Limited Power to Transfer Tribal Land 
Out off Tribal Ownership.....

Section 2. 

Limited Power to Encumber Tribal Lands . .

Section 3.  Limited Power to Develop Natural Resources

Section 4.  Principle of Construction. ........

12

12

15

15

15

16

17

17

17

19

20

20

21

21

21

21

23

23

23

24

24
 
 

ARTICLE XI - USE OF TRIBAL LAND BY TRIBAL MEMBERS 

 
 AND QUALIFIED NON-TRIBAL MEMBERS.........

Section 1.  Land Use and Natural Resources 

Conservation Plan..................

Section 2.  Use of Tribal Land by Non-Tribal 

Members................
 
 

ARTICLE XII - SUCCESSOR BUSINESS TO MENOMINEE ENTERPRISES

 
 Section 1.  Duty of the Tribal Legislature ....

Section 2.  Successors to Menominee Enterprises. .

ARTICLE XIII - TRIBAL BUSINESSES....................

Section 1.  Interrelationship Between Tribal 

Businesses And the Tribal LEGISLATURE.

Section 2.  Duty to Enforce....................

Section 3.  Forestry Business Exception.........
 
 

ARTICLE XIV - TRUST AGREEMENT BETWEEN THE MENOMINEE 

 
 INDIAN TRIBE AND THE UNITED STATES ....

Section 1.  Trust Agreement. ...............................................

Section 2.  Negotiating Principles....... .

Section 3.  Approval By Tribe Required ......
 
 

ARTICLE XV - TRIBAL GOVERNMENT CAREER AND MERIT 

 
 SYSTEM OF EMPLOYMENT........

Section 1.  Merit Principle....................

Section 2.  Duty to Enforce....................

ARTICLE XVI - FINANCIAL CONTROL........... . .........

Section 1.  Budget and Appropriations. ......

Section 2.  Accounting System..................

Section 3. Fiscal Year...................................................................

24

24

25

26

26

26

32

32

32

32

33

33

33

34

34

34

34

35

35

35

35
 
 

 
 
 ARTICLE XVII - CONFLICT OF INTEREST. .........

Section 1.  Conflicting Personal Financial 

Interest Prohibited...

Section 2.  Other Conflicts of Interest.......

ARTICLE XVIII - SOVEREIGN IMMUNITY ............... .

Section 1.  General Prohibition. . . .........

Section 2.  Suits. Againts The Tribe inTribal 

Courts By... Persons Subject To 
Tribal Jurisdiction. ........

Section 3.  Suits Against The Tribe In The 

Courts Of the United States.......

ARTICLE XIX - AMENDMENTS TO CONSTITUTION AND BYLAWS. .

ARTICLE XX - ADOPTION OF CONSTITUTION AND BYLAWS . . .
 
 

BYLAW I - OFFICERS AND COMMITTEES OF THE TRIBAL 

 
 LEGISLATURE; DUTY TO VOTE STOCK OF 
MENOMINEE ENTERPRISES, INC......
 
 

BYLAWS

 
 Section 1. Officers of Tribal Legislature . . .

Section 2.  Committees of the Tribal Legislature

Section 3.  Duty.to Vote Stock of Menominee 

Enterprises, Inc........ .  . . . .

BYLAW II - PROCEDURE OF THE TRIBAL LEGISLATURE ....

Section 1.  Meetings of the Tribal Legislature .

Section 2.  Ordinances, Resolutions, and Motions

Section 3.  Tribal Records......................................   .

Section 4.  Posting Procedure.............. .

35

35

35

35

35

35

36

36

36

37

37

38

39

39

39

41

44

45
 
 

 
CONSTITUTION AND BYLAWS
OF THE 
MENOMINEE INDIAN TRIBE OF WISCONSIN

PREAMBLE

 
 We, the members of the Menominee Indian Tribe of Wisconsin, being a sovereign 
nation, in order to organize for the common good, to govern ourselves under 
our own laws and customs, to maintain and foster our tribal culture, to 
protect our homeland and to conserve and develop its natural resources, and 
to insure our rights guaranteed by treaty with the Federal Government, do 
establish and adopt the following Articles and Bylaws of this Constitution 
and Bylaws for the government, protection and common welfare of the Menominee 
Indian Tribe of Wisconsin and its members.
 
 

ARTICLE I - JURISDICTION

 
 The governmental powers of the Menominee Indian Tribe of Wisconsin, a 
federally recognized sovereign Indian Tribe, shall extend to all persons, and 
subjects, to all lands and other property including natural resources, and to 
all waters and air space, within the exterior boundaries of the Menominee 
Indian Reservation, including any land which may hereafter be added to the 
Reservation under any law of the United States. The governmental powers of 
the Menominee Indian Tribe shall extend outside the exterior boundaries of 
the Reservation to any persons, subjects, or real property which are, or may 
hereafter be, included within the jurisdiction of the Tribe under any law of 
the united States or of the Tribe.

ARTICLE _II - TRIBAL MEMBERSHIP

Section 1.  Requirements.

Membership in the Menominee Indian Tribe shall consist of the following 
persons:

(a)  Those persons of one-quarter (1/4) degree Menominee Indian blood whose 
names appear on the tribal roll compiled pursuant to subsection 4(c) of 
the Menominee Restoration Act (87 stat. 771), and

(b)  Those persons who possess at least one-quarter (1/4) degree Menominee 
Indian blood, and who are descendants of persons enrolled on the tribal 
membership roll compiled pursuant to subsection 4(c) of the Menominee 
Restoration Act (87 stat. 771), and who are enrolled on the official 
tribal membership roll in accordance with procedures established by the 
Tribal Legislature by ordinance.

(c)  A person shall be removed from the tribal membership roll only in 
accordance with the procedures set forth in Section 5 of this Article.

Section 2. 

Ineligibility for Membership or Automatic Forfeiture of 
Membership.

No person shall be eligible to be a member of the Menominee Indian Tribe if 
that person is enrolled in another Indian Tribe. Any member of the Menominee 
Indian Tribe who applies to be and is accepted as a member of another Indian 
Tribe shall thereby automatically forfeit membership in the Menominee Indian 
Tribe and all rights and benefits to which tribal members are entitled by 
virtue of their membership.

Section 3.  Enrollment Committee.

(a)  An Enrollment Committee composed of five (5) eligible tribal voters 
shall be elected or appointed, beginning in 1992 and every three years 
thereafter, at the Annual General Council meeting in accordance with 
Bylaw III, Section 4, of this Constitution and Bylaws. The members of 
the Enrollment Committee shall be subject to the supervision of the 
Tribal Legislature. If the Enrollment Committee is appointed, the 
Tribal Legislature, by majority vote, shall have the power to terminate 
any such appointment for good cause, and to make a new appointment. If 
the Enrollment Committee is elected, the members of the committee shall 
be subject to the terms of Article VII of this Constitution, including 
the provisions of Section 2, which shall govern the manner in which the 
Tribal Legislature may expel or suspend a member of the Enrollment 
Committee from office. In the event of any vacancy, the Legislature, by 
majority vote, shall within sixty days appoint a replacement for the 
remainder of the term.

(b)  The Enrollment Committee shall have the authority and duty to maintain a 
current and accurate official tribal membership roll in accordance with 
the provisions of this Article. The Enrollment Committee shall report 
at least four (4) times a year to the Tribal Legislature as to the 
current status of the roll. The Committee shall have the authority to 
investigate suspected errors in the roll, and where it deems appropriate 
in view of evidence, shall recommend changes in the roll to the Tribal 
Legislature.

Section 4.  Appeal From Denial of Membership Application.

Any person whose application for membership in the Menominee Indian Tribe is 
denied shall have the right to appeal such adverse decision to the Tribal 
Judiciary, but only after exhausting all remedies available within the Tribal 
Legislature.

Section 5. Removal From Membership Roll by Tribal Legislature.

If, upon the report and recommendations of the Enrollment Committee, the 
Tribal Legislature determines that any person lacks a required membership 
qualification, proceedings shall be instituted against such person in Tribal 
Court to remove such person from the tribal membership roll. Only after a 
final decision is rendered in favor of the Tribal Legislature shall the 
affected person's name be removed from the tribal membership roll.

Section 6. Voluntary Relinquishment of Membership.

Members of the Menominee Indian Tribe may relinquish membership in the Tribe 
in accordance with procedures established by the Tribal Legislature. 
However, any member of the tribe who relinquishes membership voluntarily, or 
who forfeits membership by enrolling in another Indian Tribe, shall not again 
be eligible to enroll as a member of the Menominee Indian Tribe.

Section 7. Enforcement.

The Tribal Legislature shall enforce this article by ordinance, PROVIDED, 
that the Tribal Legislature shall have no power to establish substantive 
requirements for membership in addition to those established in Section 1 of 
this Article, nor to waive any of these requirements.

ARTICLE III_- POWERS OF THE TRIBAL GOVERNMENT

Section 1. Powers of the Tribal Legislature.

The Tribal Legislature, as established in Article IV of this Constitution, 
shall be vested with all executive and legislative powers of the Tribe 
including the power to make and to enforce laws, and including such powers as 
may in the future be restored or granted to the Tribe by any law of the 
United States, or other authority. The powers of the Tribal Legislature 
shall include those powers vested in the Tribe by Section 16 of the Indian 
Reorganization Act (48 Stat. 987), namely, to employ legal counsel, the 
choice of counsel and fixing of fees to be subject to the approval of the 
Secretary of the Interior; to prevent the sale, disposition, lease or 
encumbrance of tribal lands, interest in lands, or other tribal assets 
without the consent of the Tribe; and to negotiate with the Federal, State 
and local governments. This Constitution and Bylaws and ordinances of the 
Tribal Legislature adopted pursuant to this Constitution shall be the supreme 
law of the Menominee Indian Tribe and all persons subject to its 
jurisdiction. However, the Tribal Legislature shall exercise its powers 
consistent with the limitations imposed by this Constitution and Bylaws.

Section 2. Powers of the Tribal Judiciary.

The Tribal Judiciary, as established in Article V of this Constitution, shall 
be vested with all judicial powers of the tribe including the following 
powers: to resolve controversies between and among persons where such 
controversies arise under this Constitution and Bylaws, tribal ordinances, 
the Constitution and laws of the United States, or the Constitution and laws 
of any state or Indian Tribe; and to decide cases in which a person is 
accused by the Tribe of committing an offense against the laws of the Tribe. 
The powers granted to the Tribal Judiciary by this section shall include such 
judicial powers as may in the future be restored or granted to the Tribe by 
any law of the United States, or other authority. Decisions of the Tribal 
Judiciary shall be binding upon all persons within the jurisdiction of the 
Tribe. The Supreme Court of the Tribe shall be the final and supreme 
interpreter of this Constitution and Bylaws and all tribal ordinances. 
However, the Tribal Judiciary shall exercise its powers consistent with the 
limitations inposed by this Constitution and Bylaws.

Section 3. Separation of Powers.

The Tribal Legislature and the Tribal Judiciary shall be separate and equal 
branches of the Tribal Government. Neither branch shall exercise the powers 
of the other, nor shall either branch have authority over the other branch 
except as may be granted by this Constitution and Bylaws.
 
 

ARTICLE TV - THE TRIBAL LEGISLATURE

 
 Section 1. Composition, Terms of Office, and Classes.

(a)  The Tribal Legislature of the Menominee Indian Tribe of Wisconsin shall 
be composed of nine (9) members of the Tribe, elected at large by the 
eligible voters of the Tribe. Seven (7) of the offices shall be filled 
by tribal members who are residents on the Reservation. There shall be 
no residency requirement for the remaining two (2) offices.

(b)  Tribal Legislators shall serve terms of office of three (3) years. The 
nine (9) Tribal Legislators shall be divided into three (3) classes for 
the purpose of staggering terms of office. Each class shall be composed 
of three (3) Legislators. The terms of office of Tribal Legislators 
shall be staggered as follows:

(1)  The term of office of the first class of Legislators shall expire 
upon assumption of office by the newly elected Legislators three 
(3) years following the first election of Legislators held pursuant 
to Section 5(c) of the Menominee Restoration Act (87 Stat. 772), 
and every third year thereafter.

(2)  The term of office of the second class of Legislators shall expire 
upon assumption of office by the newly elected Legislators two (2) 
years following the first election of Legislators held pursuant to 
Section 5(c) of the Menominee Restoration Act (87 Stat. 772), and 
every third year thereafter.

(3)  The term of office of the third class of Legislators shall expire 
upon assumption of office toy the newly elected Legislators one (1) 
year following the first election of Legislators held pursuant to 
Section 5(c) of the Menominee Restoration Act (87 Stat. 772), and 
every third year thereafter.

Section 2. Initial Division of Tribal Legislators Into Classes.

The Tribal Legislators elected at the first election of the Tribal 
Legislature, held pursuant to Section 5(c) of the Menominee Restoration Act 
(87 Stat. 770) shall be initially divided into three (3) classes as follows:

The three candidates receiving the highest number of votes shall be the first 
class; the three candidates receiving the highest number of votes after the 
first class shall be the second class; and the three candidates receiving the 
highest number of votes after the second class shall be the third class, 
PROVIDED, that if more than two (2) non-resident candidates are among the 
nine candidates receiving the highest number of votes, only the two non
resident candidates receiving the highest number of votes of the non-resident 
candidates shall take office; the other seven (7) offices shall be filled 
with the seven (7) resident candidates receiving the highest number of votes 
of the resident candidates, in accordance with Section 1(a) of this Article.

Section 3. Election of Tribal Legislators.

(a)  Any tribal member who satisfies the requirements of Section 4 of this 
Article may became a candidate for the office of Tribal Legislator by 
filing a nominating petition which shall comply with requirements as 
established by the Tribal Legislature by ordinance, and by complying 
with such other procedural requirements as may be established by the 
Tribal Legislature by ordinance.

(b)  The Tribal Legislature shall by ordinance set the date on which 

elections to fill offices of the Tribal Legislature shall be held.

(c)  With candidates placed Ln order of number of votes received from the 
highest to the lowest, offices shall be filled beginning with the 
candidate who received the highest number of votes, and proceeding down 
the order, PROVIDED, that no more than two (2) offices of the Tribal 
Legislature shall be filled by non-resident tribal members, in 
accordance with Section 1(a) of this Article.

(d) 

If in any election to fill an office or offices, the number of 
candidates running exceeds three (3) per office, the Election Commission 
shall hold a primary election to select those candidates who shall run 
for office in the main election. The number of candidates to be 
selected in such primary election shall be determined by multiplying the 
number of offices to be filled by two (2).

Section 4.  Requirements For Candidates For Election To The Tribal

Legislature and For Tribal Legislators.

(a)  To be eligible to be a candidate for election to the Tribal Legislature, 
a person must be a member of the Tribe, at least twenty-five years of 
age as of the date on which the election is held. No person shall be 
eligible to be a candidate for election to the Tribal Legislature who 
has been convicted of a major crime as defined in Bylaw V of this 
Constitution and Bylaws, unless the Tribal Judiciary, in accordance with 
such rules as it may establish, certifies that the person in question is 
rehabilitated. Such certificate of rehabilitation shall be based upon 
the person's record of behavior since the conviction.

(b) 

In any election in which it is necessary to fill all open offices with 
residents on the Reservation in order that seven (7) offices will be 
filled by residents on the Reservation, in accordance with Section 1(a) 
of this Article, only persons who are residents on the Reservation shall 
be eligible to be candidates for election to the Tribal Legislature.

(c)  Tribal Legislators while holding office shall be members of the 
Menominee Indian Tribe. Any Tribal Legislator elected while a resident 
on the Reservation shall maintain residence on the Reservation while 
holding office. If any Tribal Legislator ceases to be a member of the 
Tribe, or if any Tribal Legislator elected while a resident on the 
Reservation ceases to maintain residence on the Reservation, the 
affected Legislator shall be expelled in accordance with Section 2 of 
Article VII of this Constitution. In addition, if any Tribal Legislator 
is convicted while holding office of a major crime as defined in Bylaw V 
of this Constitution and Bylaws, the office of the affected Legislator 
shall be deemed vacant in accordance with Section 3 of Article VII of 
this Constitution.

Section 5.  Consecutive and Simultaneous Terms of Office.

No person shall be eligible to be elected to more than three (3) consecutive 
terms of office of Tribal Legislator, nor shall any person serve more than 
one term of office at the same time.

Section 6.  Community of the Tribal Legislature.

The Tribal Legislature shall establish standing committees each of which 
shall be composed of three Legislators. Each such standing committee shall 
be assigned to a community on the Reservation as defined by the Tribal 
Legislature. It shall be the duty of each standing committee to maintain 
constant communication with the community to which it is assigned for the 
purpose of determining the needs and concerns of the community. It also 
shall be the duty of each community committee to hold quarterly community 
meetings and to inform the Tribal Legislature of any needs or concerns of 
that community.

Section 7.  Administration of Tribal Government.

The Tribal Legislature shall by ordinance establish a plan for the 
administration for the government of the Tribe; PROVIDED, that this section 
shall be construed to include the administration of the Tribal Judiciary.

Section 8. Powers and Duties.

The powers and duties of the officers of the Tribal Legislature are set forth 
in the Bylaws of this Constitution.
 
 

ARTICLE V - THE TRIBAL JUDICIARY

 
 Section 1. Structure.

(a)  The Tribal Judiciary shall be composed of one Supreme Court and of such 
lower courts as are designated to be established in this Article, and as 
may be established by ordinance by the Tribal Legislature as it deems 
appropriate to meet the needs of the Tribe.

(b)  The Supreme Court of the Tribe shall have jurisdiction over appeals from 
all final decisions of the lower courts of the Tribe. The Supreme Court 
shall be composed of three (3) judges. Supreme Court Judges may, if 
necessary and if so instructed by the Tribal Legislature, also serve as 
judges of the lower courts; however, in such a situation, the Supreme 
Court Judge shall be disqualified from participating in a review of any 
decision entered by him or her while sitting as a lower court judge.

(c)  The Tribal Legislature shall, promptly after the adoption of this 
Constitution and Bylaws, determine and establish the number of lower 
tribal courts necessary to serve the judicial needs of the Tribe. Such 
trial courts shall have general and original jurisdiction over all cases 
and controversies of a civil or criminal nature. Each trial court shall 

 be presided over by one judge.

(d)  If the Tribal Legislature establishes special kinds of lower courts with 
original jurisdiction over specified subject areas, the Tribal legis
lature shall specify whether such jurisdiction is exclusive or 
concurrent with the jurisdiction of the trial courts established in 
subsection (c) of this section.

(e)  If the Tribal Legislature establishes an intermediate level of courts to 
hear appeals from all final decisions of the lower courts, the Supreme 
Court shall hear appeals only from decisions of the intermediate courts 
of appeals. In addition, the Tribal Legislature may authorize the 
Supreme Court to exercise its discretion in all or designated kinds of 
cases in deciding whether to hear an appeal in any particular case.

Section 2. Appointment and Term of Office.

(a)  The Tribal Legislature shall by ordinance establish a procedure for 

selection of judges.

(b)  Tribal judges shall be appointed by six (6) or more votes of the Tribal 

Legislature.

(c)  Lower Court Judges shall be appointed to a term of three (3) years.

(d)  Supreme Court Judges shall be appointed to a term of four (4) years.

Section 3. Compensation.

Tribal judges shall receive for their services a reasonable compensation, as 
fixed from time to time by the Tribal Legislature. The Tribal Legislature 
shall not diminish the compensation of a Tribal Judge during his or her term 
of office.

Section 4. Qualifications and Disqualifications.

(a)  To hold the office of Tribal Judge, a person shall be a member of the 
Tribe, a resident on the Reservation during his term of office, at least 
thirty-five (35) years of age, having a minimum education of a high 
school graduate or a General Equivalency Diploma, and shall demonstrate 
fitness and competency for the office by taking appropriate 
examinations, relevant to demonstrate competence for the office of 
Tribal Judge.

(b)  No person shall be eligible to be appointed to the office of Tribal 
Judge who has been convicted of a major crime as defined in Bylaw v of 
this Constitution and Bylaws, unless the Tribal Judiciary, in accordance 
with such rules as it may establish, certifies that the person in 
question is rehabilitated. Such certificate of rehabilitation shall be 
based on the person's record of behavior since the conviction. No 
Tribal Judge who is convicted of a major crime as 
this Constitution and Bylaws shall continue to hold office.

in Bylaw V of
defined 

Section 5.  Removal From Office By Tribal Legislature and Automatic 

Vacancies.

(a)  Tribal judges may be removed from office by the Tribal Legislature by 
the affirmative vote of at least seven/ninths (7/9) of the entire 
Legislature, but only upon grounds of inability to carry out the duties 
of the office; failure to carry out the duties of the office; or lack of 
a requisite qualification for serving as a Tribal Judge. The Tribal 
Legislature shall notify the Tribal Judge in question and the Supreme 
Court, in writing, not less than twenty (20) days prior to the meeting 
at which the judge's removal is to be considered and voted upon. The 
notice shall specify the charge or charges and shall state the facts in 
The Tribal Judge in question shall have full
support thereof. 
opportunity at the meeting at which his or her removal is to be 
considered and decided upon to examine all witnesses against him or her 
and to have his or her own witnesses to testify in his or her behalf. 
The decision of the Tribal Legislature shall be final and not appealable 
to the Tribal Judiciary. The Supreme Court, may upon receipt of notice 
of the removal charges, suspend the Tribal Judge in question from office 
with or without compensation pending final action of the Tribal 
Legislature at the meeting.

(b)  The office of any Tribal Judge who is convicted of a major crime as 
defined in Bylaw V of this Constitution and Bylaws, who dies, or who 
resigns shall be deemed to be automatically vacant. Resignation from 
office shall be written and shall be deemed to be effective as of the 
date tendered unless otherwise designated in the resignation document.

Section 6.  Rules of Tribal Courts.

The Supreme Court shall by order establish written rules of procedure and 
ethics for all Tribal Courts. Such rules may from time to time be amended as 
deemed necessary or appropriate by the Supreme Court. The Supreme Court 
shall consult with the Judges of the lower courts in establishing rules of 
procedure for the lower courts.

Section 7.  Records and Court Clerk.

The Supreme Court shall implement the system of keeping records of 
proceedings of the Tribal Judiciary in accordance with Section 3(b) of Bylaw 
II of this Constitution and Bylaws. The Supreme Court shall appoint a court 
clerk which shall be responsible for keeping the records of the Judiciary and 
generally for administering the daily business of the Judiciary.

Section 8.  Appropriations.

The Tribal Legislature shall give priority for appropriations of such funds 
as may be necessary to enable the Tribal Judiciary to carry out the 
provisions of this Article.

Section 9. Enforcement.

In implementing this Article, the Tribal Legislature shall act by ordinance.

Section 1. Voter Requirements.
 
 

ARTICLE VI - TRIBAL ELECTIONS

 
 Any member of the Menominee Indian Tribe who is eighteen (18) years of age or 
older on the date of the tribal election in question shall be eligible to 
vote in tribal elections.

Section 2. Voting.

Except as may be otherwise specified in this Constitution, voting in tribal 
elections shall be by secret ballot cast at polls established on the 
Reservation. Absentee voting and write-in voting shall be permitted in 
accordance with such procedures as shall be established by the Tribal 
Legislature. Proxy voting and cumulative voting shall not be permitted in 
tribal elections.

Section 3. Action By the Tribe: Approval - Disapproval, Consent - Rejection.

Except as may be otherwise specified in this Constitution, the vote of a 
majority of the eligible tribal voters voting in a tribal election shall 
constitute action by the Tribe, including tribal approval or disapproval, and 
tribal consent or rejection.

Section 4. Regular and Special Elections.

The Tribal Legislature shall provide for the holding of regular elections, 
including establishing dates, times and places for holding such elections. 
The Tribal Legislature shall also provide for the holding of special 
elections by establishing the procedure by which such elections may be called 
and held with adequate notice provided to tribal voters.

Section 5. Tribal Election Comission.

(a)  A Tribal Election Commission composed of three (3) eligible voters of 
the Menominee Indian Tribe shall be appointed and supervised by the 
Tribal Judiciary.

(b) 

The Tribal Election Commission shall be responsible for enforcing tribal 
election laws subject to the supervision of the Tribal Judiciary. The 
duties of the Tribal Election Commission shall include but not be 
limited to the following:

(1)  Maintain a current list of eligible voters of the Menominee Indian 

Tribe.

(2)  Conduct tribal elections; and

(3)  Certify the results of tribal elections.

(c)  The Tribal Election Commission shall perform such other duties as may be 
delegated to the Commission by this Constitution, by ordinance, or by 
the Tribal Judiciary.

(d)  The Tribal Election Commission may be authorized to issue such rules as 

may be necessary to carry out tribal election ordinances.

Section 6.  Elections_Which Result in Ties.

In any tribal election which results in a tie between two or more candidates, 
the tie shall be broken by some means of chance agreed upon by the candidates 
involved. In any tribal election which results in a tie as to the approval 
or disapproval of an issue, the issue shall be determined defeated.

Section 7.  Disputed Elections.

Any eligible voter or group of eligible voters of the Menominee Indian Tribe 
may challenge the validity of the results of any tribal election on the 
ground that such election was conducted in violation of this Constitution and 
Bylaws, or of tribal ordinance or of any provision of the Indian Civil Rights 
Act (25 U.S.C.  1301 and 1302). Such challenge shall be commenced within 
ten (10) days after the Tribal Election Commission certifies the results of 
the election by a written complaint filed in a Trial Court of the Tribe. The 
complaint shall (1) specifically charge the person or persons alleged to have 
violated the law with having committed an offense against this Constitution 
and Bylaws, or tribal ordinance or a provision of the Indian Civil Rights Act 
(25 U.S.C.  1301 and 1302); and (2) specify the constitutional provision or 
provision of the Indian Civil Rights Act alleged to have been violated; and 
(3) state the facts alleged to have been violated; and (4) state the facts 
alleged to support such charge or charges. Upon filing of such complaint, 
the Trial Court shall promptly hold an initial hearing at which evidence is 
received from the carplainant or complainants in support of the charges in 
the complaint. Any person or persons charged in the catplaint shall have 
full opportunity to respond at the hearing to the charges and evidence 
offered in support of the complaint. At the conclusion of the initial 
hearing the Court may make a final decision in the case either dismissing the 
canplaint or granting the relief sought; or the Court may order interim 
relief pending further investigation and hearings in the case. If the 
disputed election involves the filling of a tribal office, and the Court 
decides that further investigation and hearings are necessary, the Court 
shall, at the conclusion of the initial hearing, specifically grant or deny 
permission to fill the office pursuant to the election results pending 
further investigation and hearing and a final decision on the charges.

The Court may at the conclusion of the initial hearing and in the interests 
of justice, appoint an unbiased commission to investigate the charges further 
and to present any evidence gathered to the Court at a hearing at which both 
sides in the case have opportunity to be heard, to present evidence and to 
question the commission. At the conclusion of all hearings, the Court shall 
decide whether the charges have been proven. If the Court determines one or 
more of the charges have been proven, the Court shall provide such relief as 
is appropriate, which may include invalidating the tribal election in 
question and ordering a new election to be held.

Section 8.  Duty to Enforce This Article.

(a)  The Tribal Legislature shall enforce Sections 1 through 4 of this 
Article by ordinance, PROVIDED, that the Tribal Legislature shall not 
establish substantive requirements for voting eligibility in addition to 
those established in Section 1 of this Article.

(b)  The Supreme Court of the Tribe shall implement Sections 5 through 7 of 

this Article by appropriate Court Order.


ARTICLE VII - REMOVAL OF ELECTED OFFICIALS FROM OFFICE, 
AUTOMATIC VACANCY, AND THE FILLING OF VACANCIES


Section 1. Recall.

(a)  Any elected official of the Menominee Indian Tribe of Wisconsin may be 
recalled from office at any time after holding office for one (1) year, 
by the eligible voters of the Tribe in accordance with the procedure set 
forth in subsection (b) of this section; PROVIDED, that recall shall not 
be a remedy against alleged action by a tribal official Which may 
constitute a crime against the ordinances of the Tribe or the laws of 
the United States.

(b)  The procedure by which an elected official may be recalled shall be as 

follows:

(1)  Petitioners' Committee. Any one hundred (100) eligible voters of 
the Tribe may commence recall proceedings by filing with the Tribal 
Election commission an affidavit stating their names, and 
addresses, the names and addresses of three (3) representatives of 
petitioners' committee, and the address to which all notices, 
regarding the petition are to be sent; and stating that they will 
constitute the petitioners' committee and be responsible for 
circulating the petition and filing it in proper form; and naming 
the tribal official sought to be recalled; and stating in not more 
than one hundred (100) words the specific reasons upon which it is 
alleged that the named tribal official should be recalled. If more 

than one official is sought to be recalled, there shall be separate 
affidavits of charges filed for each such official. The Tribal 
Election Commission shall promptly thereafter serve a copy of the 
affidavit of the petitioners' committee upon the named official in 
person or by registered mail. The named official shall have 
fifteen (15) days after receipt of service of the affidavit of 
charges to file an affidavit in defense with the Tribal Election 
Commission answering the charges made against him or her in no more 
than one hundred (100) words.

(2) 

Issuance of Petition Forms. The Tribal Election Commission shall 
within five (5) work days after the filing of the affidavit in 
defense by the named tribal official, prepare a recall petition 
form consisting of the affidavit of charges, the affidavit in 
defense, and spaces for signature and addresses. The Tribal 
Election Commission shall certify and issue to the petitioner's 
committee an appropriate number of such recall petition forms. If 
more than one tribal official is sought to be recalled, separate 
recall petition forms shall be prepared, certified and issued for 
each such official.

(3)  Circulation of Petitions. The recall petition may be circulated 
for signature for thirty (30) days following its issuance by the 
Tribal Election Commission. The petition must be signed by at 
least twenty-five percent (25%) of the total number of voters 
eligible to vote in the election in which the official sought to be 
recalled was elected. Each recall petition shall be the responsi
bility of one person who shall, upon filing the completed petition, 
attach his or her personal affidavit to the petition stating that 
he or she personally witnessed the signing of each signature and 
corresponding address contained in the petition, and that he or she 
believes each signature and corresponding address to be the name 
and address of the person who signed them, and that each person who 
signed the petition read or had explained to him or her the full 
text of the petition and the purpose of the petition. The recall 
petition with the requisite number of signatures shall be filed 
with the Tribal Election Commission. Within five (5) work days 
after the filing of the recall petition, the Tribal Election 
Comission shall certify whether the recall petition contains the 
requisite number of valid signatures, and is otherwise sufficient.

(4)  Certificate of Sufficiency.

(a)  If the petition is certified insufficient because of a lack of the 
requisite number of signatures, the petitioners' committee shall be 
promptly notified, and they shall have ten (10) days after receipt 
of notification to supplement the petition with additional 

signatures on certified recall petitions issued by the Tribal 
Election Commission, and to file such supplemental petition with 
the Commission. The Tribal Election Commission shall within two 
(2) work days after the filing of the supplemental petition certify 
as to the sufficiency of the recall petition as supplemented. If 
the petition is again certified insufficient, the petitioners' 
committee shall be notified and may appeal such decision to the 
Tribal Judiciary in accordance with the rules of court procedure. 
Fording a final decision by the Tribal Judiciary, a new recall 
petition against the same official shall not be commenced for the 
same cause.

(b)  If the recall petition is certified sufficient, the Tribal Election 
Commission shall, within ten (10) work days after it certifies the 
validity of the recall petition, set a date for a recall election 
to be held. Such recall election shall be held within thirty (30) 
days after the filing of the recall petition with the Commission 
and shall provide notice of such election date by posting notices 
at public places on the Reservation and in appropriate urban areas, 
and publishing a notice in at least one newspaper with a wide 
circulation among eligible tribal voters on the Reservation.

(5)  Recall Election.

(a)  The ballot for the recall election shall, for each official sought 
to be recalled, if more than one, state the grounds set forth in 
the recall petition for demanding such recall as well as the answer 
of the official sought to be recalled in his defense; and the 
ballot shall set forth the following question: Shall (name of the 
official sought to be recalled) be recalled from the office (title 
of office)? Following such question shall be two choices of words, 
"yes" or "no", on separate lines with the black space to the right 
of each in which the voter shall indicate by marking a cross (x), 
his vote for or against recall.

(b)  The affirmative vote of sixty percent (60%) of those voting at the 
recall election shall be sufficient to effect a recall of the 
official from office, PROVIDED, that at least thirty percent (30%) 
of the total number of eligible voters vote in the recall 
election. In the event the official is recalled, the office shall 
be deemed vacant and shall be filled in accordance with Section 4 
of this Article.

Section 2. Expulsion and Suspension of Tribal Legislators.

(a)  The Tribal Legislature shall by affirmative vote of two-thirds (2/3) of 
the entire Legislature expel a member of the Legislature from office on 
grounds of failure to attend three (3) successive regular meetings of 
the Tribal Legislature in a given Legislative year, without good reason 
as determined by the Tribal Legislature, lack of a required qualifi
cation for holding office, occurrence of a disqualification for office, 
or misuse of funds.

(b)  The Legislator sought to be expelled shall be notified in person or by 
registered mail at least ten (10) days before the holding of any meeting 
at which the legislator's expulsion from office is to be considered. 
The notice shall set forth the alleged grounds for expulsion with 
specificity. The Legislator in question shall be given full opportunity 
to be heard at such meeting and to confront any and all witnesses 
against him. If the Tribal Legislature votes to expel the Legislator in 
question, the grounds for removal shall be set forth with specificity in 
the minutes of the meeting, and the Legislature's decision shall be 
subject to prompt review by the Tribal Judiciary at the request of the 
expelled Legislator.

(c) 

In the event the decision of the Tribal Legislature to expel the 
Legislator in question is upheld by the Tribal. Judiciary, the office 
shall be deemed vacant and shall be filled in accordance with Section 4 
of this Article.

(d)  A Tribal Legislator may be suspended from office pending the appeal of 
the Legislator's conviction of a major crime by the vote of a majority 
of the total number of Tribal Legislators.

Section 3. Automatic Vacancies.

(a)  The office of any elected tribal official who dies or resigns, who is 
convicted of a major crime, as defined by Bylaw V of this Constitution 
and Bylaws, shall be deemed to be automatically vacant. Resignation of 
office shall be written and shall be deemed to be effective as of the 
date tendered unless otherwise designated in the resignation document.

(b)  Any vacancy in office which occurs under this section shall be filled in 

accordance with Section 4 of this Article.

Section 4. The Filling of Vacancies In Office.

(a)  Any vacancy in the office of an elected tribal official shall be filled 

as follows:

(1) 

(2) 

If the term of the office in question has more than one (1) year to 
run from the date of vacancy, the Tribal legislature shall appoint 
an eligible tribal member to fill such vacancy until the next 
tribal election; PROVIDED, that the Tribal Legislature shall 
exercise this right of appointment only once in any legislative 
year. If any additional vacancies occur in the same year, they 
shall be filled by a special election.

If the term of the office in question has one (1) year or less to 
run, the Tribal Legislature shall within two (2) months appoint by 
a majority vote of the total number of Legislators, an eligible 
tribal member to fill the office; PROVIDED, that if a special 
election is required to fill one or more other vacancies pursuant 
to subsection (a) (1) of this section, the Tribal Legislature shall 
submit all vacancies to election.

(b)  Any special election required to be held under this article shall be 
conducted in accordance with applicable provisions of this Constitution 
and Bylaws and with applicable tribal ordinance. If a regular election 
is scheduled to be held within the time permitted to hold a special 
election, all issues shall be submitted to vote at the regular election.

(c)  Any tribal official who, by operation of this article, vacates his 

office shall not be eligible to succeed himself in that office.

(d) 

If, by reason of vacancies in office, the remaining members of the 
Tribal Legislature constitute less than five (5), the Election 
Commission shall cause all vacant offices to be filled by special 
accordance with applicable provisions of this
election held in 
Constitution and Bylaws and applicable tribal ordinance.

(e)  Any tribal member appointed to office under the provisions of this 
section shall be deemed to be subject to all provisions of this article, 
and other articles and bylaws of this Constitution and Bylaws, and to 
other tribal ordinances generally applicable to elected tribal 
officials, and to his or her particular office.

Section 5. Tribal Judiciary Excluded.

This article shall not be applicable to the removal of the Tribal Judges, nor 
to the filling of any vacancies in the office of Tribal Judge.
 
 

ARTICLE VIII - INITIATIVE AND REFERENDUM

 
 Section 1.  General Authority.

(a)  Initiative. Eligible voters of the Tribe may propose any ordinance to 
the Tribal Legislature for consideration, in accordance with the 
procedures set forth in this article, except ordinances concerning the 
budget of the tribal government, appropriations of funds, levy of taxes, 
salaries of tribal officials, employees or appointees, or ordinances 
establishing tribal businesses. If the Tribal Legislature votes not to 
enact the proposed ordinance with substantive amendments, the preposed 
ordinance, in the original form and in the amended form if any, shall be 
submitted to the eligible voters of the Tribe at a tribal election for 
their approval or rejection in accordance with Section 5 of this 
Article.

(b)  Referendum.

(1)  By action of eligible voters. Eligible voters of the Tribe may 
require the Tribal Legislature to consider the repeal of any 
ordinance, in accordance with the procedure set forth in this 
Article, except ordinances concerning the budget of the tribal 
government, appropriations of funds, levy of taxes, salaries of 
tribal officials and employees or appointees, emergency ordinances, 
or ordinances establishing tribal businesses. And, if the Tribal 
Legislature fails to repeal such ordinance, the ordinances shall be 
submitted to the eligible voters of the tribe at a tribal election 
for their approval or repeal in accordance with Section 5 of this 
Article.

(2)  By action of the Tribal Legislature. The Tribal Legislature, on 
its own motion, may submit at a tribal election any preposed 
ordinance or other proposed action of the Legislature to a vote of 
the eligible voters of the Tribe for their approval or rejection.

Section 2.  Procedure.

(a)  Petitioners' Committee. Any twenty-five (25) eligible voters of the 
Tribe may commence initiative or referendum proceedings by filing with 
the Tribal Election Commission an affidavit (1) stating their names, 
addresses and the address to which all notices regarding the petition 
are to be sent; and (2) that they will constitute the petitioners' 
committee and be responsible for circulating the petition and filing it 
in proper form; and (3) if an initiative petition is involved, setting 
forth in full the proposed ordinance to be subject to this initiative 
proceeding; PROVIDED, that referendum proceedings shall be commenced no 
later than thirty (30) days after the Tribal Legislature enacts the 
ordinance.

(b)  Issuance of Petition Forms. Promptly upon filing the affidavit of the 

petitioners' committee, the Tribal Election Commission shall prepare and 
issue an appropriate number of certified petition forms to the 
committee.

(c) Petitions.

(1)  Form and Content. Each petition form issued to the committee shall 
contain the full text of the ordinance in question. Every petition 
form issued shall be numbered and recorded. Every page of each 
petition form shall be attached as one instrument, shall be 
numbered as part of the whole, i.e., page 1 of 10 pages, and shall 
be certified as a page of the petition by the Tribal Election 
Commission. Every signature on the petition shall be followed by 
the address of the person who signed.

(2)  Number of Signatures. Both initiative and referendum petitions 
must be signed by at least fifteen percent (15%) of the total 
number of eligible tribal voters.

(3)

Affidavit- of Circulator. Each petition shall be circulated by one 
person and upon filing a completed petition, that person shall 
attach his or her personal affidavit to the petition stating that 
he or she personally witnessed the signing of each signature and 
corresponding address contained in the petition, and that he or she 
believes each signature and corresponding address to be the name 
and address of the person who signed them, and that each person who 
signed the petition read or had explained to him or her the full 
text of the ordinance in question, and the purpose of the petition.

(d)  Time for Filina Petitions, initiative or referendum petitions must be 
circulated and filed within thirty (30) days after issuance by the 
Tribal Election Commission.

(e)  Certificate of_ Sufficiency. within five (5) work days after a petition 
is filed, the Tribal Election Commission shall certify as to its 
sufficiency.

(1)  If Certified Insufficient. If the petition is certified 

insufficient, the Tribal Election Commission shall state in the 
certificate with particularity the reasons it is insufficient. A 
copy of the certificate of insufficiency shall be promptly sent to 
the petitioners' committee by registered mail, or served personally 
upon the committee. A petition certified insufficient for lack of 
required number of valid signatures may be supplemented once, and 
for this purpose an appropriate number of petition forms shall be 

mailed or given personally to the petitioners' committee along with 
the certificate of insufficiency. Such supplemental petition shall 
comply with the requirements of this section. Petitioners' 
committee shall have fifteen (15) days after receipt of the 
certificate of insufficiency to file a supplemental petition with 
the Tribal Election Commission. Within five (5) days after the 
filing of the supplemental petition, the Tribal Election Commission 
shall certify as to the sufficiency of the petition as supplemented 
and promptly send a copy of such certificate to the petitioners' 
committee by registered mail, or shall serve a copy personally upon 
a member of the committee.

(2)  If Certified Sufficient. If an original petition or a petition as 
supplemented in accordance with Section 2(e) (1) of this Article is 
certified as sufficient by the Tribal Election Commission, a copy 
of the certificate of sufficiency shall promptly be sent by 
registered mail or served personally upon the petitioners' 
committee, and the certificate of sufficiency shall promptly be 
presented to the Tribal Legislature.

(f)  Review of Determination of sufficiency. The final determination of the 
Tribal Election Commission in accordance with the procedure in Section 
2(e) (1) of this Article that an initiative or a referendum petition is 
insufficient shall be reviewable as follows: The petitioner's committee 
must file a request for review with the Tribal Chairperson within ten 
(10) days after receipt of the final certificate notifying them of the 
insufficiency of their petition. Review shall first be made by the 
Tribal Legislature at its next meeting following the filing of the 
request for review. If the Tribal Legislature affirms the finding of 
the Tribal Election Commission, that decision may be appealed to the 
Tribal Judiciary in accordance with the rules of court procedure. 
Pending a final decision by the Tribal Judiciary, a new petition 
concerning the same matter may not be commenced.

(g)  Withdrawal of Petitions. An initiative or referendum petition may be 
withdrawn at any time prior to the final certification of sufficiency by 
filing with the Tribal Election Commission a request for withdrawal 
signed by a majority of the petitioners' committee. The petition shall 
have no further force or effect and all proceedings thereon shall be 
terminated.

Section 3. Referendum Petitions: Suspension of Effect of Ordinance In 

Question.

When a referendum petition is certified as sufficient by the Tribal Election 
Commission in accordance with the procedure set forth in Section 2 of this 
Article, the ordinance in question shall be suspended, if in effect, or from 
taking effect, if not in effect. Such suspension shall terminate if the 
petitioners' committee withdraws its petition or if a majority of eligible 
voters on submission of the ordinance in question to them for vote, vote to
retain the ordinance.

Section 4. Action on Petitions.

(a)  Action by Tribal Legislature. When an initiative or referendum petition 

has been determined sufficient, the Tribal Legislature shall:

(1)  Enact the ordinance as submitted by an initiative petition; or

(2)  Repeal the ordinance, or part thereof, referred by a referendum 

petition; or

(3)  Decide to submit the proposal in a petition to the eligible voters 
of the Tribe; PROVIDED, however, that the Tribal Legislature may 
change the detailed language of any preposed initiative ordinance 
and may affix the title thereto, so long as the general character 
of the measure will not be substantially altered.

Appropriate action by the Tribal Legislature shall be taken under this 
subsection within fifteen (15) days after a referendum petition is certified 
sufficient, and within thirty (30) days after an initiative petition is 
certified sufficient.

(b)  Submission to Voters. The election on an initiated or referred 
ordinance shall be held within thirty (30) days after the date of the 
final Tribal Legislature vote thereon. copies of the initiated or 
referred ordinance shall be made available to eligible voters not less 
than ten (10) days before the election and also at the polls at the time 
of the election.

Section 5. Results of Election.

(a)  Initiative. If a majority of the eligible tribal voters voting on a 
proposed initiated ordinance vote in its favor, it shall be considered 
effective upon certification of the election results. If conflicting 
ordinances are approved at the same election, the one receiving the 
greater number of affirmative votes shall prevail.

(b)  Referendum. If a majority of the eligible tribal voters voting on a 
referred ordinance vote for repeal, it shall be considered repealed upon 
certification of the election results. If a majority of the eligible 
tribal voters voting on a referred ordinance vote to approve such 
ordinance, it shall be considered approved upon certification of the 
election results.

(c)  Voting Percentage Requirements. No initiative or referendum election 
shall be effective unless at least fifteen percent (15%) of the total 
number of eligible voters vote in that election.

Section 6. Re-enactment, Amendment or Repeal.

An ordinance initiated and adopted by the tribal voters may not be amended or 
repealed by the Tribal Legislature for a period of six (6) months after the 
date of the election at which it was adopted, and an ordinance referred and 
repealed by the tribal voters ray not be re-enacted by the Tribal Legislature 
for a period of six (6) months after the date of the election at which it was 
repealed; PROVIDED, however, that any such ordinances may be amended or 
repealed at any time by compliance with provisions of this article.
 
 

ARTICLE IX - RIGHTS OF TRIBAL MEMBERS AND OTHER 
PERSONS SUBJECT TO TRIBAL JURISDICTION

 
 Section 1. Hunting, Fishing, Trapping, Gathering

In addition to such other rights as are guaranteed by this Constitution and 
Bylaws, members of the Menominee Indian Tribe of Wisconsin shall have the 
right to hunt, fish, trap, and gather food from plants subject only to those 
tribal laws which are necessary to conserve these natural resources of the 
Tribe; PROVIDED, that this right shall not include the right to engage in 
commercial uses of such tribal resources; such right is reserved to the Tribe 
acting through its Tribal Legislature in accordance with Section 2 of Article 
X of this Constitution. Non-tribal members shall have no right to hunt, 
fish, trap, and gather foods from plants except as may be permitted by tribal 
ordinance approved by the Tribe in accordance with Section 3 of Article VI of 
this Constitution.

Section 2. Rights of Persons Subject to Tribal Jurisdiction.

The Menominee Indian Tribe and its officers and agencies in exercising the 
powers of self-government over persons subject to tribal jurisdiction shall 
not:

(a)  establish an official government religion;

(b)  make or enforce any law (1) prohibiting the free exercise of religion or 
of the dictates of conscience; or (2) abridging the freedom of speech or 
of the press, or of peaceful assembly or association, or the right to 
petition for a redress of grievances;

(c)  violate a person's right to be safe against unreasonable searches and 

seizures of person and property;

Appropriate action by the Tribal Legislature shall be taken under 
this subsection within fifteen (15) days after a referendum pe
tition is certified sufficient, and within thrity (30) days after 
an initiative petition is certified sufficient.

(b) Submission to Voters. The election on an initiated 

or referred ordinance shall be held within thirty (30) days after 
the date of the final Tribal Legislature vote thereon. Copies of 
the initiated or referred ordinance shall be made available to 
eligible voters not less than ten (10) days before the election 
and also at the polls at the time of the election.

Section 5.  Results of Election.

(a) 

Initiative. If a majority of the eligible tribal vo

ters voting on a proposed initiated ordinance vote in its favor, 
it shall be considered effective upon certification of the election 
results. If conflicting ordinances are approved at the same elec
tion, rhe one receiving the greater number of affirmative votes 
shall prevail

(b)  Referendum. If a majority of the eligible tribal vo

ters voting on a referred ordinance vote for repeal, it shall be 
considered repealed upon certification of the election results. If 
a majority of the eligible tribal voters voting on a referred ordi
nance vote to approve such ordinance, it shall be considered 
approved upon certification of the election results.

(c)  Voting Percentage Requirements. No initiative or 

referendum election shall be effective unless at least fifteen per
cent (15%) of the total number of eligible voters vote in that 
election.

Section 6.  Re-enactment, Amendment or Repeal.

An ordinance initiated and adopted by the tribal voters 

may not be amended or repealed by the Tribal Legislature for a 
period of six (6) months after the date of the election at which 
it was adopted, and an ordinance referred and repealed by the tri
bal voters may not be re-enacted by the Tribal Legislature for a 
period of six (6) months after the date the election at which it 
was repealed; provided, however, that any such ordinances may be 
amended or repealed at any time by compliance with the provisions 
of this Article.
 
 

ARTICLE IX - RIGHTS OF TRIBAL MEMBERS AND OTHER
 
 persons subject to Tribal jurisdiction

Section 1.  Hunting, Fishing, Trapping, Gathering.

In addition to such other rights as are guaranteed by 
this Constitution and Bylaws; members of the Menominee Indian 
Tribe of Wisconsin shall have the right to hunt, fish, trap, 
and gather food from plants subject only to those tribal laws 
which are necessary to conserve these natural resources of 
the Tribe; provided that, this right shall not include the right 
to engage in commercial uses of such tribal resources; such right 
is reserved to the Tribe acting through its Tribal Legislature 
in accordance with Section 2 of Article X of this Constitution. 
Non-tribal members shall have no right to hunt, fish, trap, and 
gather foods from plants except as may be permitted by tribal 
ordinance approved by the Tribe in accordance with Section 3 of 
Article VI of this Constitution.

Section 2.  Rights of Persons Subject To Tribal Jurisdiction.

The Menominee Indian Tribe and its officers and agencies 
in exercising the powers of self-government over persons subject 
to tribal jurisdiction shall not

(a)  establish an official government religion;

(b)  make or enforce any law (1) prohibiting the free 
exercise of religion or of the dictates of conscience, or (2) 
abridging the freedom of speech or of the press, or of peaceful 
assembly or association, or the right to petition for a redress 
of grievances;

(c)  violate a person's right to be safe against un

reasonable searches and seizures of person and property;

(d)  permit searches and seizures unless a Tribal Court 
issues a warrant upon a sworn statement presented to the Tribal 
Court showing reasonable grounds to believe that an offense 
against tribal law has been committed and that the person or 
place to be searched holds evidence of the offense or that the 
person to be seized committed the offense; or that the thing to 
be seized is evidence of the offense, and describing specifically 
the person or place to be searched or the person or thing to be 
seized; provided that, searches and seizures may be permitted 
without a warrant where justified by compelling circumstances 
as shall be defined by ordinance.

(e)  Subject any person for the same offense to be put in 

jeopardy of loss of liberty more than once;

(f) 

In any criminal proceeding against any person,

(1) 

compel such person to be a witness against the 
person's own interest including any instance 
where the person's testimony reasonably might 
lead to the institution of criminal proceedings 
against that person;

(2)  deny such person the right to

(a) 

a speedy and public trial;

(b) 

to be informed of the nature and 
cause of the accusation;

(c) 

to confront adverse witnesses;

(d) 

(e) 

to have witnesses in such person's 
favor compelled to appear to testify; and

to have, at such person's own expense, 
the assistance of counsel in defending 
against the accusation.

(3)  deny to any person who is accused of a major 

offense as defined in Article V of the Bylaws 
of this Constitution, the right to a trial by 
jury of not less than six (6) persons, provided 
that, such person affirmatively requests such 
right and further provided that any person 
accused of an offense not punishable by imprison
ment, shall have such right only at such persons 
own expense.

(4) 

require excessive bail, impose excessive fines, 
or inflict cruel and unusual punishments.

(g)  Deny to any person the equal protection of tribal 

laws, provided that, this clause shall not be interpreted to grant 
to non-tribal members those rights and benefits to which the tri
bal members are entitled by virtue of their membership in the Tribe.

(h)  Deprive any person of liberty or property (1) without 

fully complying with procedural processes of tribal law, or (2) 
application of tribal laws which have no reasonable relation to 
the purpose for which they were enacted; and

(i)    Enact any law imposing punishment on one person, or 
enact any law which makes an action a crime which was not a crime 

when such action was committed, or which increases the punishment 
for a crime committed before the effective date of the law, or 
which deprives a person in any accusatory proceeding of any 
substantial right or immunity to which the person was entitled 
before the effective date of the law.


ARTICLE X - LIMITED POWER OF TRIBAL LEGISLATURE TO 
TRANSFER OWNERSHIP OF, OR TO ENCUMBER,

TRIBAL LAND OR INTERSETS THEREIN


Section 1. Limited Power To Transfer Tribal 

Land Out of Tribal Ownership.

The Tribal Legislature shall not transfer land or inter
ests therein out of tribal ownership by any means unless, prior 
to any such proposed transfer taking effect, such proposed trans
fer is approved by a vote of two thirds (2/3) of the total num
ber of eligible voters of the Tribe, by the Secretary of the 
Interior, and by Act of Congress; however, the Tribal Legisla
ture may exchange tribal land for land of equal value, but any 
such proposed exchange, prior to becoming effective, shall be 
approved by a vote of the Tribe in accordance with Section 3 of 
Article VI of this Constitution.

Section 2. Limited Power to Encumber Tribal Land.

(a)  Except as permitted in subsection (b) of this Sec
tion, the Tribal Legislature shall not pledge, mortgage, lease, 
grant licenses to use land, whether revocable or irrevocable, 
or otherwise encumber tribal land or interests therein, unless, 
prior to any such proposed encumbrance taking effect, such 
proposed encumbrance is approved by the Secretary of the Interior, 
and by a vote of a majority of the eligible tribal voters voting 
on the question, provided that, the total vote cast is at least 
fifteen per cent (15%) of those entitled to vote.

(b)  The Tribal Legislature may authorize the following 
encumbrances by a vote of a majority of the entire Tribal Legis
lature:

(1)  Grants of permission to members of the Tribe 
and to qualified non-members, in accordance with Article XI of 
this Constitution, to use specified portions of tribal land for 
residential, agricultural, commercial, or industrial purposes.

(2)  Leases to members of the Tribe of specified 
portions of tribal land for residential, agricultural, commer
cial, or industrial purposes.

(3)  Grants of rights-of-ways over tribal land or in
terests therein, for the purpose of providing municipal services, 
such as water, sewage disposal, electricity, telephone and roads, 
to and for the benefit of tribal members, or the heirs and descend
ants of tribal members who hold a land use assignment pursuant to 
Section 2 of Article XI of this Constitution, or a lease.

(4)  Leases to United States or its agencies for the 

purposes of meeting eligibility requirements for federal housing 
programs; provided that, the term of such a lease shall be for the 
minimal period of time.

Section 3. Limited Power To Develop Natural Resources.

The Tribal Legislature shall not develop on a commercial 

or industrial basis any natural resources of the Tribe without the 
consent of a majority of the total number of eligible voters of 
the Tribe.

Section 4. Principle of Construction.

Section 2 of this Article shall not be construed to deny 

to the Tribal Legislature its governmental power and authority to 
regulate activities of tribal land for the Tribes general welfare, 
including but not limited to, zoning, the regulation of commercial 
ventures, fishing, hunting and other sports activities, and regu
lations for the purpose of promoting health, safety, welfare, and 
conservation.
 
 

ARTICLE XI - USE OF TRIBAL LAND BY TRIBAL MEMBERS
AND QUALIFIED NON-TRIBAL MEMBERS

 
 Section 1. Land Use and Natural Resources 
Conservation Plan.

(a)  Land Use and Natural Resources Conservation Plan.

The Tribal Legislature shall by ordinance establish a 

comprehensive land use and natural resources conservation plans, 
for lands and natural resources subject to tribal jurisdiction. 
Such plan shall include rules and procedures by which tribal mem
bers, and non-tribal members who qualify under Section 2 of this 
Article, may obtain permission to use a specified parcel of tribal 
land for residential, agricultural, commercial or industrial pur
poses, however, such permission shall not include any subsurface 
rights except as specifically authorized by the plan. Such plan 
shall also include rules and procedures by which tribal members 
may use the natural resources Of the Tribe consistent with princi
ples of conservation.

(b)  Land Use Assignments.

Permission to use tribal land for the purposes speci

fied in subsection (a) of this Section shall be evidenced by a 
land use assignment issued to persons who qualify under Section 2 
of this Article, in accordance with the land use plan. Copies of 
such assignments shall be filed and recorded by the Tribal 
Administrator.

(c)  Land Use Assignments Not Transferrable.

Permission to use tribal land shall be a right granted
only to the person designated in the land use assignment. Such per
mission shall not be transferrable by the permittee during his or 
her lifetime, and shall pass upon the death of the permittee in 
accordance with regulations and procedures established by the Tribal 
Legislature by ordinance.

Section 2. Use of Tribal Land By Non-Tribal Members.

(a)  General Prohibition.

Except as otherwise specified in this section persons

who are not members of the Menominee Indian Tribe shall not be 
permitted to use tribal land for any purpose.

(b)  Heir or Descendent Exception.

A non-member who is an heir or descendent of a member

of the Menominee Indian Tribe shall for purposes of determining 
inheritance of any land use assignment, have the same status as 
heirs or descendents who are members of the Tribe, provided that, 
where a non-member inherits the land use assignment, and notwith
standing any provision to the contrary in the land use assignment 
issued to the deceased tribal member, the term of such use assign
ment shall be deemed to be for 25 years. The Tribal Legislature 
may renew such assignment for subsequent terms, each not to exceed 
25 years.

(c)  Consent to Abide by Tribal Laws.

Any non-member who inherits a land use assignment

from a tribal member shall thereby be deemed to have consented to 
abide by all laws of the Menominee Tribe which would have been 

applicable to such land had the land use assignment in question 
been inherited by a tribal member, and further, such non-member 
shall be deemed to have consented to the jurisdiction of the Tribe 
for purposes of enforcing such laws.
 
 

ARTICLE XII - SUCCESSOR BUSINESSES TO 

MENOMINEE ENTERPRISES

 
 Section 1.  Duty of the Tribal Legislature.

The Tribal Legislature shall reaffirm by resolution the 

"Management Plan of Menominee Enterprises, a Tribal Enterprise of 
the Menominee Indian Tribe of Wisconsin," (hereinafter referred to 
as the "Menominee Enterprises Plan") approved by Congress on 
March 14, 1975 pursuant to Section 6 of the Menominee Restoration 
Act (87 Stat. 770), in accordance with Section 14(d) of the 
"Menominee Enterprises Plan." The Tribal Legislature shall amend 
the "Menominee Enterprises Plan so that the provisions of that 
document are consistent with the provisions of Section 2 of this 
Article. Amendments to the Menominee Enterprises Plan" shall not 
be inconsistent with any provision of Section 2 of this Article.

Section 2.  Successors to Menominee Enterprises.

Before the Tribal Legislature takes any action terminating 
the "Menominee Enterprises Plan" pursuant to Section 14(d) of that 
document, or before the Tribal Legislature takes any action ter
minating any successor to Menominee Enterprises established pur
suant to this Article, the Tribal Legislature shall establish a 
successor tribal business (hereinafter "Successor Business") which 
shall assume control of the management responsibilities, and all 
books and records of the predecessor business. The Successor Busi
ness shall be the principal business arm of the Tribe and shall 
be established by means of a written charter issued by the Tribal 
Legislature by ordinance. The charter shall not be inconsistent 
with this Constitution and Bylaws and shall include, be consistent 
with, and be based upon the following principles:

(a)  Management Policy.

The Tribal Legislature in providing for the management 

of the tribal forest lands by the Successor Business shall follow 
the policy of promoting maximum self-determination of the Menominee 
Indian Tribe. The Tribal Legislature in dealing with the United States 
in the management of tribal land and interests therein shall seek fed
eral protection of the right of the tribe to self-determination and shall 
 
 

 
 
 avoid federal domination. All tribal forest lands shall be managed 
on a sustained yield basis according Co the provisions of the 
Forest Management Plan; Menominee Enterprises, Inc. 1968-1982 
(1973 Revision) including ahy revisions which may in the future 
be made in that document.

(b)  Scope of Authority of the Successor Business 

to Menominee Enterprises.

The scope of authority of the Successor Business 

shall be to manage and operate the property designated in this 
subsection (hereinafter referred to as the "subject property") 
in order to conduct the business operations of the Tribe which 
will best promote the interests of the Tribe and of the Tribal 
members. Accordingly, the primary duties of the Successor Busi
ness shall be to log, manage, and reforest the tribal forest 
land, and to manufacture, market, sell, and distribute timber, 
forest products, and related products. The Successor Business 
shall be granted all powers necessary to manage and operate 
the subject property in order properly to perform its duties 
as set forth herein. The Successor Business shall also have 
the power to operate subsidiary businesses which come within 
its scope of authority in order to further the business and eco
nomic needs of the Tribe insofar as the management and operation 
of the subject property is concerned.

The property subject to the control of the Suc
cessor Business shall be that property formerly managed and 
controlled by Menominee Enterprises and any other predecessor 
business, including the tribal mill, the tribal forest land, 
the personal property of the predecessor business, and such 
additional property as may be acquired by the Successor Busi
ness in the future. The Successor Business shall have no in
terests therein, except the right to manage such property in 
accordance with the principles set forth in this section and in 
its tribal charter. Tribal land and interests therein shall not 
be an asset of the Successor Business for any purpose. No tribal 
property, real or personal, or interests therein, shall be sub
ject to the management and control of the Successor Business un
less such property shall have been expressly stated in this sub
section to be subject to the management and control of the Successor 
Business. The Successor Business shall not be authorized to pledge, 
mortgage, lease, or otherwise encumber tribal land or interests 
therein except as may be authorized by the Tribal .Legislature 
acting in accordance with applicable federal law, tribal ordi
nances, and this Constitution and Bylaws.

The Successor Business shall be authorized to 

acquire and own land or interests therein in its own name. The 
Successor Business shall be authorized to sell for business purposes

any property owned by it in its own name and shall also be 

authorized to pledge, mortgage or otherwise encumber its own prop
erty as security for debts.

The Tribal Legislature shall have no authority over 

the operations of the Successor Business except as specifically 
set forth in this section. However, the Tribal Legislature shall 
retain all authority and power to exercise all proper governmental 
and sovereign functions over the property managed or owned by the 
Successor Business.

(c)  Sovereign Immunity.

The Menominee Indian Tribe in authorizing the estab
lishment by charter of the Successor Business does not waive, nor 
authorize its Tribal Legislature to waive, or limit the right of 
the Tribe or the Successor Business to sovereign immunity from 
suit, except as specifically provided in this subsection; nor does 
it waive or limit, or authorize its Tribal Legislature to waive or 
limit any exceptions and immunities from taxation to which the 
Successor Business is or may in the future be entitled, and to 
which the Tribe, its members, and its businessess are entitled 
by law.

For the purpose of enabling the Successor Business 

to enter into business agreements either to secure debts or to 
provide services or products, the Successor Business shall be 
authorized to agree by specific written agreement with any party 
to sue and be sued in its capacity as a tribal business upon any 
contract, claim, or obligation arising out of its authorized ac
tivities. For the same purpose, the Successor Business shall be 
authorized to agree by specific written agreement with any party 
to waive any immunity from suit it might otherwise have.

(d)  Distribution of Profits of the Successor Business.

The profits of the Successor Business shall be allocated 

in the manner set forth in this subsection.

(1)  The Successor Business shall, as soon as prac

ticable, make a determination of the net profits of the Successor 
Business for each fiscal year. That profit shall be determined 
from revenues; cost of sales; operating expenses; general income 
and expenses; taxes, if any; and interest payments on the outstand
ing bonds administered in accordance with the bond indenture dated 
April 30, 1961, First Wisconsin Trust Company as trustee, and on 
any outstanding supplemental bond indentures.

(2)  Excess profits shall then be determined by 

subtracting from net profits such amounts as are deemed appro
priate by the Board of Directors for expansion, for asset re
placement, and for sinking fund or a reserve to retire the 
principal obligation on the bond indentures named in subsec
tion (d) (1) of this section.

(3)  Excess profits shall then be divided by the 

Board of Directors on an equitable basis between an amount to be 
retained by the Successor Business (hereafter 'retained share) 
and an amount to be paid over by the Successor Business to the 
Tribal Legislature, representing the Tribe (hereafter tribal 
share"). In making the division between the retained share and 
the tribal share, the Board of Directors shall consult exten
sively with the Tribal Legislature and shall be guided by indus
try standards.

(4)  The Tribal Legislature shall then determine 

whether the tribal share shall be utilized for tribal opera
tions, distributed to tribal members, or divided and used for 
both purposes. In making its determination as to the distribu
tion of the tribal share, the Tribal Legislature shall use its 
best judgement and shall carefully consider both the need for 
effective tribal operations and the individual financial needs 
of tribal members.

(e)  Authority, Duties, and Rights of the Board 
of Directors of the Successor Business

In addition to such other authority granted by this 

section and to such other authority as may be granted by the 
Successor Business charter, not inconsistent with this Consti
tution and Bylaws, the Board of Directors of the Successor Busi
ness shall be granted the following authority and rights and 
shall be directed as follows:

(1)  The Board of Directors of the Successor Busi

ness shall be authorized to vote themselves a reasonable compen
sation for services; but any increase in compensation shall not 
take effect during the term of office of any Director serving 
at the time the increase was voted upon.

(2)  Directors shall be subject to recall on 

grounds of dishonesty, incompetency, nonparticipation in Board 
matters, or other conduct detrimental to the interests of the 
Tribe or the Successor Business,

(3)  The Board of Directors of the Successor Busi

ness shall be authorized to elect and remove officers of the 
Board and officers of the Successor Business, and to fill va
cancies in such offices, in accordance with the procedure set 
forth in subsection (b) (3) of this Section.

(4)  The Board of Directors shall be authorized to 

appoint a tribal member to fill the vacant office until the next 
annual election when a tribal member shall be elected to complete 
the term of office in question.

(5)  The Board of Directors shall be authorized to 
determine the amount of excess profits of the Successor Business 
to be retained by the Successor Business (retained share), and the 
amount to be paid over to the Tribal Legislature on behalf of the 
Tribe (tribal share) in accordance with the formula set forth in 
Subsection (d) of this Section.

(6)  The Board of Directors shall be authorized to 
amend the following parts of the charter of the Successor Busi
ness: the part which concerns the internal rules and regulations 
of the Board of Directors, that part which concerns the meetings 
of the Board of Directors and voting at such meetings, that part 
which concerns the officers of the Board of Directors, and that 
part which concerns the location of the principle place of busi
ness of the Successor Business.

(7)  The Board of Directors, its officers, and the 

officers of the Successor Business, shall be indemnified from any 
court awarded damages that might result from the performance of 
the duties of office.

(4) times a year to transact the business of the Successor Business.

(8) 

The Board of Directors shall meet at least four 

(f)  Rights of the Tribal Members.

(1) There shall be twelve (12) members of the Board
of Directors. All Directors of the Board of Directors of the Suc
cessor Business shall be tribal members with at least one fourth 
(1/4) degree Menominee Indian blood elected at large for three 
(3) year terms of office. The terms of office shall be staggered 
such that four (4) of the twelve (12) Directors are elected annually.

(2)  Eligible voters of the Tribe shall have the 

right to vote for members of the Board of Directors of the Suc
cessor Business, as well as on other matters submitted to the 
tribal voters for a vote at regular and special business meet
ings of the Successor Business. Write-in voting, and absentee 
voting shall be permitted, but voting by proxy, and cumulative 
voting shall not be permitted.

(3)  Eligible tribal voters shall have the right to 
recall members of the Board of Directors in accordance with the 
following procedure: upon receipt of a petition signed by two 
hundred (200) eligible voters, setting forth the alleged misconduct 
with specificity, the Secretary or other appropriate officer of the
 
 

 
 
 Successor Business shall call, and give notice of a special meet
ing of the tribal members. Such meeting shall be held in not less 
than ten (10) nor more than thirty (30) days after receipt of 
such petition. At such meeting, eligible tribal voters shall vote 
on the question of whether the Director in question shall be 
removed from office on the basis of one or more of the grounds 
set forth in the petition. No Director shall be removed from 
office unless (a) at least thirty percent (30%) of all eligible 
voters participate in the recall election and (b) at least two- 
thirds (2/3) of the eligible voters participating in the recall 
election vote in favor of removal.

(4)  The tribal members shall have the right to have 

an annual business meeting of tribal members held to receive re
ports on business operations, to elect directors, and to transact 
other business.

(5)  Eligible tribal voters shall have the right to 

petition for special business meetings of the tribal members in 
accordance with the following procedure:

The Secretary of the Successor Business shall 
call such a meeting upon receipt of a written petition which is 
signed by not less than two hundred (200) eligible voters and 
which sets forth with specificity the business to be transacted 
at the special meeting. The Secretary shall notify eligible vo
ters of the meeting by posting notice in accordance with Section 
5 of Article III of the Bylaws of this Constitution. Such no
tice shall state the place, day, hour and the purpose or pur
poses for which the meeting is called. Such notice shall be 
posted not less than ten (10) nor more than fifty (50) days before 
the date of the meeting. If the place of meeting is not desig
nated in the notice, the place of meeting shall be the office of 
the Successor Business, but any such meeting may be adjourned to 
reconvene at any place designated by a vote of a majority of eli
gible voters who are present at the meeting. No business shall 
be transacted at any special meeting except as designated in the 
notice of the meeting.

(6)  There shall be at least one hundred and 

twenty-five (125) eligible tribal voters present at business 
meetings of the tribal members before business can be conducted 
at such meetings.

(7)  To be included on the ballot for election to 

the Board of Directors, a candidate must be named in a nominating 
petition which is signed by at least seventy-five (75) eligible 
voters and filed, with the appropriate officer of the Successor 
Business at least thirty (30) days before the annual business 
meeting to elect the board members.

(g) 

Involvement of the United States.

The United States Government shall not be granted any 

authority in regard to the operation of the Successor Business, 
except as specifically negotiated and agreed upon in a written 
trust agreement between the United States and the Menominee Indian 
Tribe.
 
 

ARTICLE XIII - TRIBAL BUSINESSES

 
 Section 1. 

Interrelationship Between Tribal Businesses 
And The Tribal Legislature.

All business ventures of the Tribe shall be conducted by 

tribal businesses established by written charters issued by the 
Tribal Legislature by ordinance. Such tribal businesses shall be 
established for purposes of management only and no tribal assets 
shall be transferred to the ownership of such business; however, 
such business may be authorized to acquire property in its own 
name. Such tribal businesses shall not be authorized to pledge, 
mortgage, lease, or otherwise encumber tribal lands or interests 
therein subject to their management. However, such tribal business 
may, consistent with federal law, be authorized to pledge, 
mortgage, lease, and otherwise encumber land or interests therein 
held in its own name as security for debts, and to acquire, sell, 
lease, exchange, transfer, or assign personal property or interests 
therein. Each tribal business shall be subject to the authority 
and control of a Board of Directors, or such other form of manage
ment as the Tribal Legislature designates in the charter. The Tri
bal Legislature shall not interfere with the business decisions of 
the management of the business; however the Tribal Legislature 
shall retain all. authority and power to exercise all proper gov
ernmental and sovereign functions over the tribal business and 
over property managed or owned by the tribal business. Profits of 
such tribal businesses shall be shared with the Tribe on an 
equitable basis. Regular reports on the financial status of such 
tribal businesses shall be made to the Tribal Legislature and to 
the tribal members.

Section 2.  Duty to Enforce.

The Tribal Legislature shall enforce this Article by a 

code of laws establishing, insofar as practicable, uniform rules 
governing the establishment and operation of tribal businesses.

Section 3.  Forestry Business Exception.

This Article shall not be applicable to the forestry busi

ness of the Tribe which is covered by Article XII of this 
Constitution.
 
 

ARTICLE XIV - TRUST AGREEMENT BETWEEN THE MENOMINEE
INDIAN TRIBE AND THE UNITED STATES

 
 Section 1.  Trust Agreement.

Upon taking office, the Tribal Legislature shall enter 

into negotiations with the United States for the purpose of execu
ting the kind of trust agreement between the Tribe and United 
States as is contemplated in Section 4 of the "Trust and Manage
ment Agreement between the Menominee Indian Tribe of Wisconsin 
and the Secretary of the Interior of the United States of 
America" (hereinafter "Trust and Management Agreement"). Such 
agreement shall provide the Menominee Indian Tribe with maximum 
control over its own property and its own affairs and shall define 
accordingly the long-term, ongoing trust relationship between 
the Tribe and the United States.

The Tribal Legislature shall make every effort to exe
cute such a long-term trust agreement prior to the expiration 
of the "Trust and Management Agreement," now in effect and 
scheduled to expire six (6) months after the date on which the 
Tribal Legislature takes office. If the long-term agreement 
cannot be executed prior to the expiration of the "Trust and 
Management Agreement", the Tribal Legislature shall reaffirm the 
"Trust and Management Agreement" pursuant to Section 3 of that 
Agreement until such date as a new long-term agreement is 
executed.

Section 2.  Negotiating Principles.

The Tribal Legislature in negotiating a long-term trust 

and management agreement with the United States shall be bound 
by the following principles which the Menominee Indian Tribe con
siders fundamentally important parts of such an agreement:

(a)  The United States should expressly acknowledge 
that the Menominee Indian Tribe has the right to be self-deter
mining to the maximum possible extent while still preserving the 
integrity of the trust responsibility of the United States to the 
Tribe. This includes the right to manage and control all tribal 

businesses, and the right to tax all assets within the Tribes 
jurisdiction, including tribal assets held in trust.

(b)  The powers and responsibilities of the United 

States as trustee should be expressly and specifically set forth 
in the agreement.

the tribal forest land shall be managed on a sustained yield basis.

(c) 

 The United States should expressly agree that 

(d)  The United States should expressly acknowledge 

that all tribal assets transferred to the United States in trust 
for the Tribe shall, as of the date of this transfer, be exempt 
from all local, state and federal taxation; and that the Tribe, 
the tribal assets, the tribal members, and the tribal businesses 
shall be entitled to all immunities from taxation to which American 
Indian Tribes, their members, and their businesses are entitled by 
the laws of the United States.

(e)  The United States should expressly agree to pro
vide business advice and other advice and assistance to the Tribe 
on request of the Tribe.

(f)  The United States should expressly acknowledge 

the Tribe's right to exercise all sovereign and governmental pow
ers within the boundaries of the Menominee Indian Reservation ex
cept those which the United States Congress has expressly and 
specifically denied the Tribe the right to exercise.

Section 3. Approval by Tribe Required.

Any long-term agreement negotiated pursuant to Section 1 

of this Article between the Menominee Indian Tribe and the United 
States shall be effective only if such agreement is approved by 
vote of a majority of tribal voters voting, so long as the total 
vote cast is at least fifteen percent (15%) of those entitled to 
vote. Amendments to such agreement shall be effective only if 
approved in the same manner as the agreement.
 
 

ARTICLE XV - TRIBAL GOVERNMENT CAREER AND MERIT SYSTEM 
OF EMPLOYMENT

 
 Section 1.  Merit Principle.

All employment and promotions of employees of the tribal 

government shall be made solely on the basis of merit and fitness 
as demonstrated by examinations or other evidence relevant to show 
competence for the particular employment in question. All termination 

of employment with the tribal government shall be made 

solely on the basis of incompetence, or any other reason which 
results in failure to perform employment duties satisfactorily. 
This section shall apply to appointed tribal officals, but 
not to elected tribal officials or tribal judges.

Section 2.  Duty to Enforce.

The Tribal Legislature shall enforce this Article by 

ordinance.
 
 

ARTICLE XVI - FINANCIAL CONTROL

 
 Section 1.  Budget and Appropriations.

All appropriations by the Tribal Legislature of tribal 
funds shall be in accordance with an annual budget established 
by ordinance.

Section 2.  Accounting System.

The Tribal Legislature shall by ordinance establish an 
accounting system, approved by an independent certified public 
accounting firm, and shall cause an audit of the tribal accounts 
to be conducted annually.

Section 3.  Fiscal Year.

The Tribal Legislature shall by ordinance establish a 

fiscal year for the tribal government.
 
 

ARTICLE XVII - CONFLICT OF INTEREST

 
 Section 1. Conflicting Personal Financial Interest Prohibited.

In carrying out the duties of tribal office, no tribal 

offical, elected or appointed, shall make or participate in 
making decisions which involve balancing a substantial personal 
financial interest, other than interests held in common by all 
tribal members, against the best interests of the Tribe.

Section 2. Other Conflicts of Interest.

The Tribal Legislature may by ordinance prohibit other 

kinds of conflicts of interest.
 
 

ARTICLE XVIII - SOVEREIGN IMMUNITY

 
 Section 1. General Prohibition.

The Tribal Legislature shall not waive or limit the right 

of the Menominee Indian Tribe to be immune from suit, except as 
authorized by this Article and by Article XII of this Constitution.

Section 2. Suits Against The Tribe In Tribal

Courts By Persons Subject To Tribal Jurisdiction.

The Menominee Indian Tribe shall be subject to suit in Tri

bal Courts by persons subject to tribal jurisdiction for the purpose 
of enforcing rights and duties established by this Constitution and 
Bylaws, by the ordinances of the Tribe, and by the Indian Civil 
Rights Act, 25 U.S.C. 1301 and 1302. The Tribe does not, however, 
waive or limit any rights which it may have to be immune from suit 
in the courts of the United States or of any State.

Section 3. Suits Against The Tribe In The 

Courts Of The United States.

In seeking redress of grievances against the Tribe, persons 
subject to tribal jurisdiction shall exhaust all remedies available 
to them under this Constitution and Bylaws and the ordinances of 
the Tribe before seeking redress of grievances against the Tribe in 
the courts of the United States under any law of the United States 
granting those persons such rights.
 
 

ARTICLE XIX - AMENDMENTS TO CONSTITUTION AND BYLAWS

 
 This Constitution and Bylaws is adopted pursuant to Section 

16 of the Indian Reorganization Act (25 U.S.C. 476, 48 Stat. 987) 
and may be amended in accordance with the rules and regulations 
adopted by the Secretary of the Interior pursuant to that section. 
The Secretary of the Interior shall hold an election on the adop
tion of an amendment or amendments to this Constitution and Bylaws 
when requested by a vote of two-thirds (2/3) of the entire Tribal 
Legislature or by a petition signed by at least three hundred (300) 
eligible tribal voters and validated in accordance with applicable 
rules of the Secretary, or if none, with applicable tribal ordinance. 
The Secretary of the Interior shall not propose amendments to this 
Constitution and Bylaws.
 
 

ARTICLE XX - ADOPTION OF CONSTITUTION AND BYLAWS

 
 This Constitution and Bylaws, when adopted by a majority 

vote of the eligible voters of the Menominee Indian Tribe of 
Wisconsin, voting in an election called for that purpose by the 
Secretary of the Interior, in which at least thirty percent (30%) 
of those entitled to vote shall cast their ballots, and 
submitted to the Secretary of the Interior for his approval, 
shall be effective from the date of approval.
 
 

BYLAWS

 
 ARTICLE I - OFFICERS AND COMMITTEES OF THE TRIBAL LEGISLATURE: 

DUTY TO VOTE STOCK OF MENOMINEE ENTERPRISES, INC.

Section 1.  Officers of the Tribal Legislature.

(a)  Number. There shall be three officers of the 

Tribal Legislature. A Chairperson, a Vice-Chairperson, and a 
Secretary. No legislator shall hold more than one (1) of these 
offices simultaneously. 

.

(b)  Election and Terms of Office. The Chairperson, 
the Vice- Chairperson and the Secretary shall be elected by 
the Tribal Legislature in accordance with rules and proce
dures established by the Legislature.

(c)  Qualifications. The Chairperson shall be a resi

dent on the Menominee Indian Reservation.

(d)  Removal. A Legislator may be removed from the 
office of Chairperson, Vice-Chairperson or Secretary by the 
Tribal Legislature on grounds of failure to perform adequately 
the duties of the office in question, or non-participation in 
business of the Legislature.

(e)  Vacancies. A vacancy in the office of Chairperson 
or Vice-Chairperson, or Secretary shall be filled by the Tribal 
Legislature for the unexpired portion of the term.

(f) 

 Chairperson of the Tribal Legislature. The Chair

person shall receive a reasonable compensation for services. 
Such compensation shall not be increased or decreased during 
a Chairperson's term in office. The Tribal Legislature may 
authorize the Chairperson to serve full time in the office.

The duties and powers of the Chairperson shall include 

but not be limited to the following:

(1)  Preside at all meetings of the Tribal Legis

lature and at any other meeting called by the Tribal Legisla
ture at which the Chairperson may be designated to preside.

(2)  Represent the Tribal Legislature in its re

lations with other governments, but only where the Tribal 
Legislature has specifically and expressly authorized the 
Chairperson to do so provided that the Tribal Legislature shall 
not authorize the Chairperson to take any action which under 
this Constitution and Bylaws must be taken by the Tribal Legis
lature .

(3)  Appoint members of all committees of the 

Tribal Legislature subject to the approval of the Legislature 
and in accordance with rules of procedure of the Legislature.

tees of the Tribal Legislature.

(4)  Serve as an ex officio member of all commit

(5)  Call special meetings when appropriate of 

the Legislature and of any committee of the Legislature, in 
accordance with this Constitution and Bylaws, laws of the Tribe, 
and rules of procedure of the Legislature.

(6)  Receive reports of all committees of the 

Legislature and deliver such reports or cause such reports to 
be delivered to the Legislature.

(7)  Exercise supervision over all committees 

of the Legislature and recommend to the Legislature the estab
lishment, consolidation, or abolition of Legislative committees.

(8)  Be responsible for the administrative details 

of calling and holding meetings of the Legislature and of the 
tribal members.

(9)  Perform such other duties as may be pres- 

scribed by this Constitution and Bylaws, by ordinance, or as re
quired by the Tribal Legislature.

(g)  Vice-Chairperson of the Tribal Legislature. The 

Vice-Chairperson of the Tribal Legislature shall perform the 
duties of the Chairperson when the Chairperson is absent or 
unable to perform his duties, or as long as the office is 
vacant. In addition, the Vice-Chairperson shall perform such 
other duties as may be prescribed by this Consitution, by 
ordinance, or as required by the Tribal Legislature.

(h)  Secretary of the Tribal Legislature. The Secre

tary of the Tribal Legislatue shall perform the duties of 
the Chairperson when the Chairperson and the Vice-Chairperson 
are absent or unable to perform such duties. The Secretary 
shall also perform such other duties as may be required by 
the Tribal Legislature.

Section 2.  Committees of the Tribal Legislature.

The Tribal Legislature shall establish such committees 
as it deems appropriate to provide research, Investigating and 
advisory assistance to the Legislature in the exercise of its 
powers, provided that, each committee shall be headed by a 
Tribal Legislator.

Section 3.  Duty to Vote Stock of Menominee Enterprises, 

Inc.

The stock of Menominee Enterprises, Inc. which was trans

ferred to the Tribe by the document entitled, "Transfer, Assign
ment and Special Endorsement of Security" made pursuant to the 
Menominee Transfer Plan submitted and approved by the Congress 
of the United States pursuant to Section 6 of the Menominee 
Restoration Act (87 Stat. 772) shall be voted by the Tribal 
Legislature. The Tribal Legislature shall also exercise all 
other rights in regard to such stock.
 
 

ARTICLE II - PROCEDURE OF THE TRIBAL LEGISLATURE

 
 Section 1. Meetings of the Tribal Legislature.

(a)  Regular Meetings.

The Tribal Legislature shall meet in official session 

at least four (4) times a year at such time and place as shall 
be established by ordinance. The order of business for any 
such meeting shall be posted in accordance with Section 4 of 
this Article; however, other business may also be transacted 
at such meeting if the Tribal Legislature votes to consider 
such other business.

(b)  Special Meetings.

(1)  Calling and Notice.

Special meetings of the Tribal Legislature shall 

be called by the Chairperson of the Legislature or by the 
Tribal Administrator, or by either the Chairperson or the 
Tribal Administrator upon the written request of any two (2) 
Legislators, provided that, at least seventy-two (72) hours 
written notice of such meeting shall be given to each Legis
lator, by personal service or by registered mail sent to the 
Legislator's usual place of residence, or left at the Legisla
tor's usual place of residence with some person of suitable 

age and discretion residing there; however, notice may be 
waived by attendance at the meeting. Notice to tribal mem
bers shall be posted as provided in Section 4 of this Article 
promptly after such meeting is called. Special meetings of 
the Tribal Legislature shall be called by the Chairperson 
upon the petition of three-hundred (300) eligible tribal voters, 
provided that, not less than five (5) nor more than thirty (30) 
days notice of such meeting is given to tribal members.

(2)  Business.

No business shall be transacted at any special 

meeting of the Tribal Legislature unless such business has 
been stated in the notice of such meeting. However, any busi
ness which may lawfully come before a regular meeting may be 
transacted at a special meeting if all the members of the 
Legislature consent in writing.

(3)  Emergencies.

A special meeting of the Tribal Legislature may 

be called upon less than seventy-two (72) hours written notice 
if such meeting is necessary for the preservation or protection 
of the health, welfare, peace, safety, or property of the Tribe. 
Efforts shall be made to give maximum practical notice to each 
Tribal Legislator. Maximum practical notice shall be given to 
such meeting, and such notice shall be posted as provided in 
Section 4 of this Article, promptly after such meeting is 
called. No business other than that stated in the notice 
shall be transacted.

(c)  Open Meetings and Executive Sessions.

All meetings of the Tribal Legislature called pur

suant to this Article shall be open to tribal members; and tribal 
members shall have a reasonable opportunity to be heard under 
such rules and regulations as the Legislature may prescribe, 
provided, however, that the Legislature may meet in executive 
session for the following purposes:

(a)  Personnel matters.

(b)  Claims against the Tribe or the Tribal 

Legislature, whether in litigation or 
otherwise.

(c)  Legal consultation and advice.

(d)  Matters involved in litigation concern

ing the Tribe or the Tribal Legislature.

(e)  Deliberation and/or review of any matter 
heard by the Legislature in a quasi-judi
cial capacity.

(f)  Negotiations concerning the purchase, sale, 

lease or other acquisition of real or per
sonal property, or Interests therein, or 
concerning any contracts except those
required to be the subject of competitive 
bidding.

The Tribal Legislature may determine not to keep a record 

of all or any part of the discussion in executive session; how
ever, the general reason for such determination shall be re
corded, and a record shall be kept of any action taken in execu
tive session. Such record may be withheld from inspection by 
tribal members pending final disposition of the matter concerned.

(e)  Organization and Rules of the Tribal Legislature.

The Tribal Legislature shall adopt by motion written 

rules governing its own organization and procedure. Such 
rules shall be open and available to review by tribal members 
in accordance with Section 3 of this Article.

Section 2. Ordinances, Resolutions, and Motions.

(a)  Kinds of Action by Tribal Legislature.

The Tribal Legislature shall act only by ordinance, 
resolution or motion. All acts of a general and permanent 
nature or those affecting compelling intersts of the Tribe 
or tribal members shall be by ordinance. All other actions 
shall be in the form of resolutions or in the form of motions. 
Action by resolution shall be the form of action in which 
the purpose or policy underlying the action is expressly set 
forth. Action by motion shall be the form of action in 
which only the action taken is expressly set forth without 
an accompanying statement of purpose of policy. Ordinances 
making appropriations shall be confined to the subject of 
appropriations, but may include more than one appropriation.

(b)  Action by Ordinance Required.

In addition to such acts of the Legislature as are 
required by other provisions of this Constitution to be by 
ordinance, the following acts shall be by ordinance: an appro
priation, creating an indebtedness, authorizing the borrowing 
of money, levying a tax, establishing criminal or civil penal
ties, and any act which places any burden upon or limits the 
 
 

 
 
 use of private property without the consent of the owner, or 
which limits the freedom of tribal members to exercise rights 
to which they are entitled by virtue of their membership in 
the Tribe, or which limits any right granted by this Consti
tution and Bylaws to any person.

(c)  Form of Ordinances.

Every ordinance shall be introduced in written or printed 

form. The enacting clause of all ordinances shall be: BE IT 
 
 
ORDAINED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE MENOMINEE INDIAN TRIBE OF 
 
 WISCONSIN.

(d)  Procedure For Passing Ordinances.

Except for emergency ordinances and ordinances organiz

ing into codes other related and existing ordinances, the follow
ing procedure for enactment of ordinances shall be followed:

(1)  The ordinance shall be introduced at either 

a regular or special meeting of the Legislature by any Legis
lator or Legislators, and

(2)  The ordinance shall be read in full, and copies 

of the ordinance shall be made available to the Tribal Legisla
ture and to tribal members at or before the meeting at which the 
ordinance is introduced.

(3)  After the first reading of the ordinance, in 

accordance with (2) above, it shall be approved with or with
out amendment, rejected, or tabled by vote of the Tribal Legis
lature.

(4) 

If the ordinance is approved on the first reading, 

it shall promptly be posted in full in accordance with Section 4 
of this Article, unless otherwise provided in this Constitution. 
The Legislature shall hold a tribal hearing on the ordinance not 
earlier than four (4) days nor later than fourteen (14) days after 
posting, and notice of the tribal hearing, specifying the day, hour, 
and place of the same, shall be included in the posting.

(5) 

If the ordinance is tabled, it shall be recon

sidered at subsequent meetings until it is approved with or without 
amendment, or rejected, by vote of the Legislature.

(6)  The ordinance shall be read in full a second time 

at the tribal hearing for adoption, rejection, or other action as may 
be taken by vote of the Tribal Legislature.

and Bylaws after adoption, an ordinance shall be posted by title
only, stating that complete copies of the ordinance are available

(7)  Except as otherwise provided in .this Constitution 

at the offices of the Tribal Legislature, and if the ordinance 
was amended subsequent to its last previous posting, the posting 
shall state that it has been amended and shall contain a sum
mary of the subject matter of all amendments.

(8)  All ordinances shall take effect five (5) 

calendar days after posting following final passage, except as 
otherwise provided in this Constitution and Bylaws, or as speci
fied in the ordinance itself.

(e)  Voting By The Legislature.

(1)  Ordinances.

Except as provided in subsection (g) of this section, 

and except as may otherwise be provided in this Constitution and 
Bylaws, every ordinance shall be adopted at a regular meeting of 
the Tribal Legislature by the affirmative vote of at least a ma
jority of the entire Tribal Legislators provided that, the 
quorum for such meetings shall be five (5) Legislators.

(2)  Resolutions and Motions.

Every resolution and motion shall be adopted by the 

affirmative vote of at least a majority of the Tribal Legislators 
present at a regular or special meeting of the Tribal Legislature; 
provided that, the quorum for such meetings shall be five (5) 
Legislators.

(f)  Review of Ordinances By Tribal Judiciary.

If in reviewing an ordinance, a Tribal Court finds 
a part or parts of the ordinance to be invalid, the Court shall 
determine whether the remaining parts of the ordinance are ren
dered inoperable as a result of the invalidity of the part or 
parts in question. If the Court determines that the ordinance is 
not rendered inoperable, such ordinance shall, without the 
invalid part or parts, continue in effect.

(g)  Emergency Ordinances:

Emergency ordinances for the immediate preservation 

of public health, welfare, peace, safety, or property may be 
adopted by the Tribal Legislature at any meeting at which the 
emergency ordinance is introduced. The facts showing such 
urgency and need shall be specifically stated in the ordinance 
itself. No ordinance making a grant of any special privilege 
shall ever be passed as an emergency ordinance. No action required 
by this Constitution and Bylaws to be taken by ordinance shall 
take effect immediately upon passage and, for information pur
poses, shall be posted or published in full promptly after pas
sage. An emergency ordinance shall not be in effect longer than 
sixty (60) days after passage.

(h) Codification.

The Legislature shall, where appropriate, organize ordi

nances into codes and maintain such codes in current form. The 
Legislature shall periodically review the codes and ordinances and 
examine them for current need.

(i)  Technical Codes.

Standard technical codes, including amendments and revi

sions, promulgated by the Federal Government, or by any state, or 
by another Indian Tribe or by recognized trade or professional or
ganizations may be adopted, in whole or in part, by reference in 
an adopting ordinance without reading or posting such codes in full. 
Such adopting ordinance shall also be deemed to adopt by reference, 
in whole or in part, any other codes incorporated in the adopted 
code. The enactment of ordinances adopting any such code or codes 
shall be as provided in subsection (f) of this section, and the 
posting thereof shall state that copies of the code or codes pro
posed to be adopted are available for inspection at the office of 
the Tribal Administrator. Any penalty clause in said code or codes 
may be adopted only if set forth in full in the adopting ordinance.

(j)  Amendment or Repeal.

No ordinance or section or subsection of an ordinance shall 

be amended, superseded, or repealed except by an ordinance regularly 
adopted, provided that, repeal may be by reference to the title of 
the ordinance or any part thereof.

(k)  Authentication of Ordinances.

An ordinance as finally enacted shall be authenticated by 

the signature of the Chairperson of the Legislature or other person 
authorized by the Tribal Legislature. A true copy of every such 
authenticated ordinance shall be numbered and recorded in the offi
cial records of the Tribe. Attached to each ordinance and made a 
part thereof, shall be a certification by the Chairperson of the 
Tribe or other person authorized by the Legislature, that the same 
has been posted in accordance with this Constitution and Bylaws and 
any applicable tribal ordinance.

Section 3.  Tribal Records.

(a)  Tribal records shall include documents of all kinds 

and any other form of record keeping which result from the operation 
of both branches of the tribal government. Except as otherwise 
specifically provided by tribal ordinance, tribal records shall in
clude, but not necessarily be limited to the following: records of 
meetings of the Legislature or of the General Council and any action 
taken therein; records of court proceedings and any court decisions 

or orders; all correspondence, memoranda, and any other documents 
or other form of records produced by tribal officials or their 
agents while holding tribal office and during the performance of 
the duties of tribal office.

(b)  The Tribal Legislature may designate the form in 

which tribal records shall be kept. The Tribal Legislature shall 
keep records of all actions taken by the Tribal Legislature and 
its departments and other agencies. The Tribal Legislature, shall, 
if feasible, keep records of all debate and discussion underlying 
such actions. It shall also, if feasible, keep records of all 
action, debate and discussion at. General Council meetings. The 
Tribal Legislature, in consultation with the Supreme Court of 
the Tribal Judiciary, shall provide for the keeping of all rec
ords of proceedings, decisions, and orders of the Tribal Judiciary. 
The Supreme Court of the Tribal Judiciary shall be responsible 
for implementing the record keeping system so established.

(c)  All tribal records shall be the exclusive property 

of the Menominee Indian Tribe, and shall be transferred by 
tribal officials leaving office to the appropriate tribal 
officials in office.

(d)  Tribal records shall be preserved in the files of 

the Tribal Legislature or, where appropriate, in the files of 
the Tribal Judiciary. Except as provided in subsection (a) of 
this Section, all tribal records shall be fully accessible for 
review by any tribal member or his or her authorized represen
tative, provided that, such review shall be conducted during 
normal office hours of the Legislature. The Tribal Legislature 
shall establish rules and procedures so that such review will 
be conducted in a reasonable manner so as to avoid undue dis
turbance of the daily operation of the tribal government.

Section 4.  Posting Procedure.

The following shall be the procedure of the Legislature 
in posting any notice, ordinance, or other document as required 
by this Constitution and Bylaws or by tribal ordinance.

(1)  The Legislature shall designate by ordinance 

no fewer than four (4) public places within the reservation 
and an appropriate number of places in appropriate urban areas 
where such posting shall be done. If any posting place is to be 
changed, the Legislature shall make such change by ordinance.

(2)  Posting shall take place as soon as practicable.
 
 

ARTICLE III - GENERAL COUNCIL

 
 Section 1.  Establishment Of General Council; 

Response To Recommendations.

(a)  There is hereby established a General Council which 

shall be a meeting called at least once a year by the Tribal Legis
lature and open to all tribal members. The purposes of the General 
Council shall be to discuss problems and issues concerning tribal 
affairs; to review the policies, goals, and priorities of the Tribal 
Legislature; to review the functioning of tribal programs and to 
make recommendations for change.

(b)  The Tribal Legislature shall respond to any recommen

dations of the General Council in writing and shall post such re
sponse in accordance with Article III, Section 4 of the Bylaws of 
this Constitution.

Section 2.  Annual General Council Meeting.

The Tribal Legislature shall set the time, date, and place 

for the annual meeting of the General Council, and shall provide 
reasonable notice to tribal voters of such meeting by posting such 
notice in accordance with Article III, Section 4 of the Bylaws of 
this Constitution. The first item of business at the annual meeting 
of the General Council shall be an election to determine whether 
the Chairperson of the Legislature shall chair such meeting or 
whether a tribal voter in attendance shall be elected from the 
floor to chair such meeting. The last item of business shall be a 
vote as to whether the meeting shall be adjourned or recessed; 
provided that, at least fifty (50) voters shall be required to re
cess a meeting.

Section 3.  Special General Council Meeting.

(a) The Tribal Legislature may call special General Coun

cil meetings when it deems appropriate.

(b) Tribal members may require the Tribal Legislature to 

call a General Council meeting for a specified purpose or purposes 
by presenting to the Tribal Legislature a petition with two hundred 
(200) signatures of eligible tribal voters, which petition shall 
specify the purpose or purposes for calling the meeting. The General 
Council meeting called pursuant to a petition shall be convened no 
later than thirty (30) days following the presentation of a valid 
petition.
 
 

 
 
 Section 4.  Election of Enrollment Committee.

The Enrollment Committee established by Article II, Sec

tion 3, of this Constitution may be elected at the annual 
General Council meeting; provided that, the quorum for the 
holding of such election shall be one hundred fifty (150) tri
bal voters. If a quorum is not present, the Tribal Legislature 
shall within two (2) months appoint the Enrollment Committee 
from applications submitted by tribal voters. The annual 
General Council meeting shall not be subject to recess insofar 
as the election of an Enrollment Committee is concerned. To be 
included on the ballot for election to the Enrollment Committee, 
a candidate must be named in a nominating petition which is 
signed by at least seventy-five (75) eligible tribal voters 
and filed with the Tribal Legislature at least thirty (30) 
days before the annual General Council meeting. Absentee vo
ting shall be permitted at such election.
 
 

ARTICLE IV - OATH OF OFFICE

 
 Every tribal official shall, prior to assuming the du

ties of the office take the following oath of office:

I, _______________, do hereby solemnly swear that I

will support and defend the Constitution and Bylaws of the 
Menominee Indian Tribe of Wisconsin, that I will carry out 
faithfully and impartially the duties of my office to the best 
of my ability; and that I will promote and protect the best 
interests of the people of the Menominee Indian Tribe of 
Wisconsin.
 
 

ARTICLE V - DEFINITIONS

 
 As used in this Constitution and Bylaws, except as 

otherwise specifically provided or indicated by the context;

(a) 

"Major Crime" means any crime included in 18 

U.S.C. 1153 and any equivalent crime defined under any state 
law.

(b) 

"Convicted of a major crime" means conviction of a 

crime, as defined in paragraph (a) of this Article, where no 
further appeal is possible.

fc) "Tribal Official" means any person who is elec

ted or appointed to office by the Tribal Legislature, includ
ing appointees co boards and commissions; however, this term 

shall not include members of the Board of Directors of Menominee 
Enterprises or any equivalent body of any successor business to 
Menominee Enterprises, or any person or persons appointed to manage 
a tribal business.

(d) 

"Tribal Funds" means all funds of the Menominee Indian 

Tribe, except funds derived from appropriations of the United States 
or the State of Wisconsin.

(e) 

"Tribal Law" means an ordinance or ordinances adopted 

by the Tribal Legislature.

(f) 

"Tribal Employees" means all persons regularly employed 

by the tribal government who receive monetary compensation for 
their services.

(g) 

"Resident on the Reservation", "residence on the Res

ervation", or "reside on the Reservation" means physically residing 
within the exterior boundaries of the Menominee Indian Reservation 
as established by the Treaty of Wolf River of 1854 (10 Stat. 1064).

(h) 

"Shall, in the context of provisions establishing the 

duties of the tribal government," means that compliance with the 
provision in question is mandatory, and may be compelled by order 
of the tribal court, after all administrative remedies have been 
exhausted.

(i) 

 "May", in the context of provisions establishing the 

duties of the tribal government, means that compliance with the 
provision in question is left to the discretion of the tribal gov
ernment or its agents and may not be compelled by order of the 
tribal court, unless there is an abuse of discretion.
 
 

ARTICLE VI - AMENDMENTS TO BYLAWS

 
 These Bylaws are an integral part of this Constitution; 

therefore, these Bylaws shall be subject to amendment in the same 
manner as the Constitution, in accordance with Article XVIII of 
the Constitution.


 
CERTIFICATE OF RESULUTS OF ELECTION

FOR VOTING FOR ACCEPTANCE OR REJECTION OF CONSTITUTION AND BYLAWS 

OF THE MENOMINEE TRIBE OF WISCONSIN, HELD ON NOVEMBER 12, 1976

Pursuant to an election authorized by the Secretary of the Interior on 

September 28, 1976, the attached Constitution and Bylaws of the Menominee 

Tribe of Wisconsin was submitted to the qualified voters of the tribe and 

was on November 12, 1976, duly (rejected) (adopted) by a vote of 468 

for and 426 against, in an election in which at least 30 percent of

the 1,308 members entitled to vote cast their ballot in accordance with 

Section 16 of the Indian Reorganization Act of June 18, 1934 (48 Stat. 984), 

as amended by the Act of June 15, 1935 (49 Stat. 378).

Casimir L. LeBeau
Chairman, Election Board

Ada E. Deer
Member, Election Board

Benjamin Miller
Member, Election Board
 
 

APPROVAL

 
 I, (Sgd) Ben Reifel, Commissioner of Indian Affairs, 

by virtue of the authority granted to the Secretary of the Interior by the 

Act of June 18, 1934 (48 Stat. 984), as amended and delegated to me by 

230 DM 1.1, do hereby approve the Constitution and Bylaws of the Menominee 

Tribe of Wisconsin. Such approval is granted with the understanding that 

Section 1(a) of Article II and all other provisions of said Constitution 

defining tribal membership are construed to mean (a) that those persons 

whose names appear on the tribal roll compiled pursuant to subsection 

4(c) of the Menominee Restoration Act (87 Stat. 771), including those 

persons who have less than one-quarter (1/4) degree of Menominee 

Indian blood, and whose names are also listed on the final roll of 

the Menominee Tribe prepared pursuant to the Act of June 17, 1954 

(68 Stat. 250), are members of the Menominee Tribe; (b) that they 

are not to be removed from membership for the reason that they have 

less than one-quarter (1/4) degree Menominee blood; and (c) that they 

shall have all rights and privileges afforded members of the Menominee 

Tribe.

(Sgd) Ben Reifel

Commissioner of Indian Affairs

Washington, D. C.

Date: Jan. 21, 1977_____ __

